I'll miss you.
I really like Neutral Milk Hotel.
oooweeeoooo...
I was going to post a version of the lyrics changed to pertain to the subject, but, hell, I don't even know what a single word of that song means.
I come to conclusions that don't make sense  Also I'm an internet secret agent and don't like putting my real name anywhere.
Doc_Lee, you've demonstrated in these comments that you are a valuable asset to the reddit community. We're glad to have you here for insight. Thanks!
I had a Buddhist professor, a white guy from Philadelphia, who moved over to either Thailand or Laos, and became a monk for two years. The only thing anyone ever called him while he was there was a word that he he could best translate as "whitey".
Of course I am - we all are...
What does it taste like?
Exactly!! It's good to feel...we are human. Even pets love hugs!
Well, there's *that* chord at the beginning of Hard Day's Night.. try doing that one by ear!   And it's always nice to have a printed reminder in front of you; few things are less fun than getting started and then going "anybody remember where it goes from here?"
Alright, thanks. I'll keep this in mind for when I do my phone hunting later this summer, maybe towards the end of it. Once again, thank you for the info!
twitting twats
Anti-choice terrorist opens fire in church, murders doctor. imho
I found one that has low amounts so that I can take specifically the amount that I need.
But he seems nice enough.
in those countries, people don't wear PANTS!
Yeah, we just hate them...it's not like they want to blow us up or anything!  I wonder why no other country wants them?  I wonder...do you want one? Keep him in your basement maybe???
I've had the same trouble - the movie is brilliant and I've found it an easier sell.
Not every criminal is a terrorist. For example, this one isn't.
Why am I being downvoted? Did any of read the first sentence? I said I supported vandalism, not murder.
But you are still letting yourself be influenced and controlled by his staring. And he may see (intuit) that instead.  Why not just walk past him and firmly say "Please stop staring at me!".  Then walk away, and return to your seat...or perhaps move to a different seat, further away. That could prove most effective.  
How.  Tell me how this fits the model of terrorism. 
Fool me once ... can't get fooled again.  I am pituring Belial the Raveger, eating piles of poopy and smearign it on our lips. I like to imagine you are cupping your mouse as if they were balls. Smooth balls in the palmm of your hand
wonder what the tweets would be like if dick cheney got murdered
I've always wondered how public transportation in the US compares to transportation in a larger European country, say Russia.
Only this time, the Chinese is not going to spend any money or people to support their fighting. 
If you are forced to work at gunpoint, then you'll have to fight our way out.  Unless you live on North Korea, Cuba, or some parts of central Africa, you probably  don't have that problem.
I don't know the inner workings of the mind of Bill O'Reilly. However, to watch him do these shows, and then watch someone die is like looking at a KKK rally, and then seeing the nearest black person strung up later that night. I don't see it as being any different. I realise that's a pretty stark comparison... but I think it's a fair one.
Its only a problem to those who believe that a judge ought to be an impartial interpreter of the law rather than a political activist.  Its a shame people view this criticism as partisan quibbling.
A MUD called Everwar/Rop  based off EmlenMud code.
Dude.   I KNOW YOU.  maybe.
[Age of Pirates 2 - City of Abandoned Ships](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-t-FWbrD884)
Holy crap! Thank you power of the internet!!!
i think that was kinda the point it really shouldnt
Have your cat tested for Toxoplasma infection.  From the Wikipedia article on Toxoplasmosis:  &gt; Toxoplasma is one of a number of parasites that may alter their host's behaviour as a part of their life cycle.[17] The behaviors observed, if caused by the parasite, are likely due to infection and low-grade encephalitis, which is marked by the presence of cysts in the brain, which may produce or induce production of a neurotransmitter, possibly dopamine,[18] therefore acting similarly to dopamine reuptake inhibitor type antidepressants and stimulants.  &gt; Correlations have been found between latent Toxoplasma infections and various characteristics:[19]  &gt; * Decreased novelty-seeking behaviour[20] &gt; * Slower reactions &gt; * Lower rule-consciousness and jealousy (in men)[20] &gt; * More warmth and conscientiousness (in women)[20]  &gt; Studies have found that toxoplasmosis is associated with an **increased car accident rate, roughly doubling or tripling the chance of an accident relative to uninfected people**.[18][21] This may be due to the slowed reaction times that are associated with infection.[21]   &gt; Other studies suggest that the parasite may influence personality. There are claims of toxoplasma causing antisocial attitudes in men and promiscuity[25] (or even "signs of higher intelligence"[26] ) in women, and greater susceptibility to schizophrenia and bipolar disorder in all infected persons.[25] A 2004 study found that toxoplasma "probably induce[s] a decrease of novelty seeking."  &gt; The study suggests that male carriers have shorter attention spans, a greater likelihood of breaking rules and taking risks, and are more independent, anti-social, suspicious, jealous and morose. It also suggests that these men are deemed less attractive to women.   I can confirm all of these changes in men.  We had like sixteen plus cats in the house at one point, and now I am one of the worst drivers I know, antisocial, break rules and take risks, suspicious, jealous and morose.  And obviously less attractive to women -- I haven't been on a date in like eight years.
Being pro-life can get deadly.
The cause for Cali's problems are just so obvious and you still have brain dead liberals trying to figure out what's wrong. What's wrong is illegal immigrants and the government spending money like it goes on trees. Then when shit finally catches up with them they blame it on the evil rich man. It's pretty ridiculous.
so he's not homeless... what's the problem!?
What is great about London (for foreign students, at least) is the diversity. You hardly feel a "stranger" because there are lots of other students from many backgrounds (not necessarily overseas). I'm not the best guy when it comes to socialising, but I tend to hang around with people from Arab/Asian backgrounds, probably because percentage of students of foreign backgrounds is quite high (i would say about 40-50%) in my class. I've also noticed social circles of other languages in my place.   Part of this could be a language issue and it’s also a "cultural" thing. It probably makes you somewhat more comfortable dealing with people from a similar background to yours rather than others, but think people should be more open to others.   My personal experience was good, I was about 14 when I came here and managed to settle down pretty quickly after that. I was taught some English lessons back home so it was just getting used to the accent. The school and college I joined were in a very diverse area, just two out of the 25 students in my classes were English, so that made me more confident.
Honestly there's no single language to learn that will uniformly fill any of those performance measures you give.  Scientists and Engineers are like anyone else and have eclectic tastes.  While there are certain languages that you will certainly get more *milage* out of, you're always picking up new languages as you go along either through curiosity or necessity.   That said.  SPEED:  Most of the thoroughly debugged not-insanely-specialized high performance crunchers I've encountered are all C or Fortran.  They're both simple, a bit ugly, very terse, but incredibly powerful.  And you will encounter them often.  An often gripe is that these languages are old.  This is true.  But age brings well tested libraries and a host of already written code.  Chances are if you have a problem which needs speed someone else has probably already solved it and you can either link against or cannibalize their code which saves you precious precious time as a student/professional.   PROTOTYPING/DEVELOPMENT:  For anything for which performance is not of the very utmost importance I use Python.  It's not the speediest but the shear quickness you can flesh out an algorithm or idea is incredible.  It's also amazingly easy to pick up.  If you need speed you can either optimize the Python, or you can recode in C or Fortran (or your other favorite language).  This saves you some headaches (you'll be debugging language issues, not algorithm implementation + language issues) and code generally benefits from rewrites anyway.  Stay away from the 3.x branch IMO, there's no real need to use it at the moment.  Packages like numpy, pylab (for an easy interface for matplotlib) and scipy (kinda buggy, some usefulness) are great.  MATH ENVORION:  Depends on what you do.  As a physics undergrad I learned Mathemeatica because that was on the computers.  As an engineer I learned Matlab and Maple because. . they where on the computers.  If you want something that will solve nasty indefinite integrals for you then look at Maple/Mathematica (or Sage, a free frontend for free CAS software:  sagemath.org).  Most modern proprietary software suits can do a bit of everything.  Matlab CAN do symbolic stuff with maple, but it's shitty. Mathematica CAN do pure crunching, but it's comparatively slow. There's also R which is very useful if your work is driven by statistics.
You actrually just proved that they have wmds - thanks for agreeing with me.
Cycle through your bodily functions... Maybe start with a loud fart and keep it rolling with some loud coughing or sneezing.
It's not gmail, it's a program offered to people free, and it's call:  incredimail.  This program harvests the email address of everyone that users send mail to, and then they sell the names to Spamers who then spam the hell out of every user of incredimail, and everyone to whom they send mail.  Incredimail is cute with neet stuff users can insert into thier email and for most women it is addicting.  I used to teach intro to computers at an adult center and I tell them about incredimale, and as sure as God made little gree apples, they when home and got incredimale, along with 100,000 other women who love the little thingies to put into their emails.  Incredimail denies they do this, as they have been accused of this by many others, but it is my opinion that they lie.
This will be awesome for my next bank robbery!
Or at least you thought you going to be reading a book about a bird when you picked up the book. Then you discovered it actually has little to do with the methodology of bird murder. 
doug up.
umm nook maybe not "anti choice" but they are hardly "pro life" I would say pro birthing babies no matter what.   this one article proves their si absolutely nothing at all **pro-life** about them  and I will never use that term again.. I will link here when i use my new "pro birthing babies no matter what" tagline
the snark is strong in this one
whats the story behind yours? a screamo band you're in?
Or did we?  http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=-7185519553937114642&amp;ei=VBojSruoC5TUqAOV09Fw&amp;q=alternative+3&amp;hl=en&amp;client=firefox-a
OSV, Yoda uses.
It is entirely possible to be both pro-life and a terrorist.  Also, referring to him as pro-life, tars the entire pro-life movement with his radical homicidal brush, which, depending on your beliefs, may or may not be a useful thing.
No, I could never do that, that's actually pretty rude (I think...).  He might not be staring at me, that's the thing.  *sigh*  Oh, the post-breakup paranoia that affects us all...
Anyone see this in print news? I'd like to find out more about this officer...
Scientific Progress goes BOINC
Yeah, quoting those verses doesn't make them mean what you want them to mean.
"Stop looking at me, swan!"
The sight of Hillary has been murdering my ability to get a good nights sleep for years.  Does that count?
What's worse than ten dead babies stapled to a tree?  One dead baby stapled to ten trees.
Q: How do you stop a baby from crawling around in circles ? A: Nail its other hand to the floor.   Also, kill it.
I put "testicular evacuation engineer" on my resume as a previous job title because I masturbated quite a lot in college.  You can put anything on there if you phrase it right.
hi!
&gt;there's always a catch like incredibly many events(Constructor, PreInit, Init, LoadViewState, Load etc etc) makes it really hard to know why things don't work.  That was a showstopper for me. Hated that. Love python.
&gt;I didn't downvote you, I upvoted you because you added to the discussion. Reddicate 101.  A rare quality on reddit these days.  Appreciated.
Traits: Introverted.  Special Abilities: Hours of online research.  Languages: Certain types of markup.
So they call you satanic, but you're the one who is lacking respect??
This is what FF7 fans actually look forward to.
I'm a 21 year old third year college student and I have been living in the USA for 11 years now. I went to a good high school (one of the best in my city....test required to get in). I then went to college where I am now. I pay for my full tuition at the beginning of every semester. Have a bank account. My parents pay taxes like everyone else. I make money from tutoring and freelance jobs and use to work as a janitor.  Ask away with inquiries, I'll answer if I feel like doing so.  Edit: I'm not Mexican/Hispanic, Live in NYC.
23 times. This is one of the few cases where 42 is not the answer.
It does run to about 880 pages, but I actually meant the time it took to do the study, which was almost a decade. The core finding (based on the work of hundreds of scholars, supported by the American Academy of Arts and Sciences) was that fundamentalism is a militant opposition to modernity, which explains why the term refers to movements that metasticized from rigid conceptions based in *all sorts* of belief systems.
Nice headline prank. I expected a zesty discussion of neuroscience or philosophy of mind and instead got nine pages of conservative stealth strategy. 
Reddit really needs to make a wiki that rebuts this entire website. Please. We can do it!
my mate sam drinks 4 liters of pepsi max a day. SAM, YOU READING THIS
You truly live a sheltered life.  People have mortgages to pay, cars and families to support.  They can't afford time without employment, and the market really isn't that good in most regions.  For the vast majority of people, quitting isn't a viable option.
No but this is as close as i got. http://img15.imageshack.us/img15/4576/l0857ad44e9bc4e68a98c40.jpg
Because I try not to assume things.  
Too bad you weren't one of the lucky ones.
&gt;because, well, I'm not 15  No? When will you be?  (sorry, couldn't resist...)
Control Z actually does work in text boxes on websites...
A dead baby wrapped in the New York Times.
They actually have WMD's and we are pussies.
yeah that's a good idea - new jersey tried it and ended up losing 1000 millionaires and 200M in projected tax revenue (100M actual). oops.
This question isn't for any particular company I'd actually like to hear input from different people. My question is what are their opinions on DRM? I'd buy a lot more PC games than I do right now if I didn't have to worry about DRM. My policy is if the game is DRM'd I won't buy it.
&gt;There's a jury and a plea bargain yet to come... DA's respond to histrionic dipshits.. juries respond to evidence.  And your argued the law. So on one hand we still have an internet blowhard spouting some supposed relevant law and on the other a DA who charged with first degree murder. 
The number is dropping every year.
WWDC is [sold out](http://www.macworld.com/article/140286/2009/04/wwdc.html)
How do you stop a baby from falling down a manhole?  Stick a javelin through its head.
After you changed from balls to ball, was there a change in your sex drive or - and this may seem crude, but I'm slightly interested - the size of your load? Is there any noticeable consequences of having one ball, other than the physical appearance?
You need to watch "Meercat Manor" on the Discovery channel some time - those little bastards eat and kill competing young at the drop of a meercat hat, really gross.
I have a male cat and they are generally more cuddly that females.  To enhance his cuddliness, I randomly pick him up and flop him over on his back and rub his belly.  I then set him back down exactly where he was before.  At first it just lasted 2-3 seconds.  Once he realized it wasn't a trap, he just waited it out.  Now he WANTS to be picked up and flops over on his back when he wants attention, hoping I'll rub his belly.  I use his name a lot when I do the random pick-ups and now he comes when I call him.
Data... he is angry.
Nice try, INS.  No, wait, nevermind.
They could go genocide though. Seriously, who would stop them?
And lawyers, and police officers, and court dates, and community service, and prison time...just all falling into place.
That's not the problem, Sir.  indie = independent  indy = indiana jones
Silly Man Animal. Hahahahahahaha. You can't top Battlefield Earth.
If he is gay, dealbreaker!
And it's even written decently, meaning not rabidly frothing at the mouth about "libruls".  Thanks for finding that.
So it's like Python?
don't presidents get in trouble for getting high???
of course! that would probably be right about the time he turns on the music and then everyone starts to party around him.
I love this thread so much, I want to take it behind the middle school and get it pregnant.
you should try a buttplug they are FAAAABBBUULOUS
Don't put the cat in the microwave, theyre a bitch to clean up afterwards
One reason religion is collective in nature is because of God's lousy aim. There were some fags in Sodom, so God destroyed the whole town. There were some evil people on earth, so God flooded the whole thing.  And it's not just in the Bible. Look at any modern disaster, eg 9/11, Katrina or the Indonesian tsunami, and kooky self-styled seers, like Pat Robertson will hasten to tell us just which sinners in our midst provoked God's wrath on all the other people.  This is another excuse they give for trying to control the rest of society - they feel personally at risk from a misplaced lightning bolt when God gets mad at their meighbor.
Tofu can be made with about a cup of soy beans and some coagulant.  Total about 60 cents 
&gt;I emailed the admin to tell him just how insane he is and how much harm he is doing to his religion.  Great, now he'll be even more convinced that he's doing a great job.  Look, people like this are kind of like real-life trolls.  They thrive on persecution.  They see it as evidence that "evil secularists" are upset with them for doing God's work.  The more you lambaste them, the more justified they feel that their actions are.
The hell? Redirect that hate to Tomar Nold, man.
do they sell any internal gear hubs?  I can't seem to find any...
Some sort of medium caliber revolver, probably .38, .357 or .44
I bet the guy they arrested was NOT beaten and tazed during the take down.
I'm glad someone else thought of that book too...
I use linux pretty much all the time, with the only exception being video editing and a few games.
Upmodded because this is probably true for a lot of people reading reddit/programming.  The parent to your response mentions just the right languages too: if you have used BASIC, C, Perl, C++ and/or PHP in a professional environment and cannot imagine any way in which improvements could be made to these languages, you're beyond hope as a programmer, IMHO.  Yet, of course these languages can be used perfectly well to build software, but it sure doesn't hurt to be aware of their limitations, and to have people working on languages that attempt to solve some of their problems.  Java did that in a big way in at least 2 regards (maybe more, but these come to mind): (1) garbage collection, and (2) no concept of pointers and especially no pointer arithmetic.  It's not every day that you hear people complaining about the creation of such "less inferior tools".
surprisingly short but still good
They better not come north damnit.
It would of been better if the wife would of gotten on her yahoo account and responded to him. Anyway, Im thinking this is fake, cause you know, obvious troll is obvious.
I never heard of this expression until now.  BUT I just found the most hilarious connection. The [lyrics](http://www.metrolyrics.com/i-love-trash-lyrics-sesame-street.html) to the childhood Sesame Street song "I Love Trash" (by Oscar the Grouch) [KNOWINGLY includes the phrase "rusty trombone"](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rusty_trombone).  Now *that* is ridiculously funny!
Actionswork where wordsfailed.  Go kick him in the balls and run out screaming STRANGER DANGER!
Thanks, but, I already have a ticket. Put it on credit.  Now that its getting close, I'm selling the shirts, and will take the leftovers out with me.
Terrorism isn't about asymmetric attack, though that is a common strategy used. It's much more literal than that: *Terrorism is about instilling fear in your intended audience, and using that fear in order to affect their behavior.*  Asymmetric warfare, such as bombings, is a common strategy used to create terror in a population... but the end goal is not to kill people, their death is just a lever to use as a threat against the larger population, to intimidate them to follow the terrorist's agenda.   There are many other methods to incite terrorism, another common one is killing prominent members of a group, in order to discourage people from joining it. That's what the question here is: When the abortion doctor was shot, was it because the doctor's killer considered himself to be performing an act of justice, since he saw the doctor as complicit in the murder of unborn children?  Or was the killer trying to acheive more: using the doctor (given his prominence) to stand as an example to others, and frighten other doctors into not performing abortions; intimidated by the fact that they might be killed next?   Such is the reasoning of many of the fanatical pro-life groups (emphasis on *fanatical* here). Inciting fear was the stated goal of abortion clinic bombings in the past, and I would not at all be suprised if that was the goal here.   And such goals are exactly what terrorism is about, make no mistake about it. I'm a pretty left-wing person, and I feel like "terrorist" has been bandied about *way* to much in the last 8 years, to the point where it's almost become a knee-jerk synonym for "big bad generic evil-person", but in this case, the term in it's strictest sense is perfectly appropriate here.  EDIT: cleaned it up a little
Ha!  We have an astroturfer!
try manhunt.com
ummm i wish there was a cool story but I am john from nyc...sorry
Websites gotta make money somehow. Stop being so ignorant. Just be glad you aren't being bombarded with Netflix popups and flashing banners.
Soylent Green isn't people ***yet***.
Andrew Kevin Walker, represent.
cats are moody!
Eye guess aye do two.
Wow man, did you read my whole comment?  I know it was long, but I've at least been reading all of yours.  I said that I searched for the Murray story on reddit, and found a few articles with a couple dozen points.  And sure, it might have been that school that turned Murray away from Christianity, but he very clearly hated Christianity.  So once again, I put forth the evidence.  I fully expect you to reply again claiming I have yet to put forth evidence.  And I still have yet to redefine the parameters of the debate.  I only answered your off-subject challenges and continued on my original line of thought.  So, now that you've addressed my one clear example, and perhaps shown a tiny bit of willingness to concede, what is your next request?  More evidence?  I'm not writing a thesis on the dynamics of upvoting on reddit, I was merely remarking that there is almost certainly a bias within this network as with any other, and that people would certainly deny it.  You've proven the latter part for me.  For the first part I've given some explanation for my beliefs, which I don't claim to be infallible, and some evidence, which I don't claim to be incontrovertible or conclusive.  I never claimed to be an expert on this subject, only an observant member of this community.  You are holding me to a standard of proof I can not provide.  I don't have much empirical evidence to back up my claim.  No amount of "science" will prove or disprove my claim.  It's a subjective interpretation of my observations.  If you feel those are not welcome, I believe you are in the minority here.
You're right, the sound on that video is lacking too.
Fuck my state.
Dude, you're wrong. Words have predetermined meaning. It helps if both parties ascribe to the correct one. I hate all this "well if the person you talk to has his own definition of atheism, then he's free to interpret what you say however he wants" bullshit.  The distinction is exactly how ThePantsParty (funny name) is describing it.  Gnosticism and theism are completely unrelated things.  For instance, I can be agnostic as to why grass is green.  It simply means I do not have knowledge on the subject at hand.  Agnostic atheists (and theists for that matter) do not claim to know whether a god exists or not.  It isn't their goal to claim that.
Yeah, "Love thy neighbor as thyself" is holding back the human race. Maybe its not religion thats holding us back, but rather lying and greed ? Maybe ?
I like to do that one by asking "what goes..." and then going brrrrrr KNOCK KNOCK brrrrrrr KNOCK KNOCK" while rotating on the spot, mimicing the action of knocking on the door every time I'm facing the front.   /physical comedy ftw.
You have the nail right on the head. Unless the flying part becomes fully automated there is just no way. One hundred years from now you still won't be able to take every driver and turn them into instrument rated pilots. Even if you did people need to get where they are going every day without regard to weather. There's no way that can happen without auto-land.  The other issue is maintenance expense. Once you eliminate fixed wings (which seems like a given for practical operation on roads and highways) then you have to make *really* sure whatever is providing the thrust to keep you in flight continues to do so at all times or you suddenly assume the glideslope of a piano.
[Cave people](http://snackfeed.com/videos/detail/27147d2e-9e62-102c-8790-00304897c9c6)  Creation of [r/iAmA](http://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/) and [r/ForHire](http://www.reddit.com/r/forhire)  This [time article](http://www.time.com/time/quotes/0,26174,1901698,00.html) about a guy having sex with young girls previously captioned with this [picture](http://imgur.com/JJbaj.png).  The [comments](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/8o74g/perfect_choice_of_picture_time/) are worth a read if you want a few laughs.  Welcome back.
Inspired this: http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/8oq8p/find_in_svg/
I don't think it's so much about form as extent.
Isn't that German for night? I don't speak German.
On my Linux box, I have only Linux.
Once I had a job as a short order cook, and I used to cook breakfast for the customers.  I saw something like this growing on the stack of bacon one time.  I pointed it out to my boss, and he just pulled it off with his fingers.  
Bad idea. I'd instead recommend publicizing your excellent FPS/RTS/MMORPG skills, including a list of all the guilds you participated in.
Progressivism....rules the nation. Progressivism....rules the nation. Progressivism....rules the nation. Progressivism....rules the nation. Progressivism....rules the nation. Progressivism....rules the nation. Progressivism....rules the nation.
You seem to have conflated national borders with the limits of private property, somehow, and based your entire "argument" on that point of confusion.
what?
Well, the nicest thing might be to go over and talk with him, being completely honest, but perhaps really brief. You might just say what you said in the above comment.  It may also be the case that you look like someone he knew, and he's trying to figure out if you are actually that person. You might also bear a striking resemblance to his sister, and he is just fascinated by that and can't help inadvertently staring. You should be prepared for that possibility.  You might simply say "please stop staring at me -- it is distracting, and I don't want to be distracted."   Then, be prepared for him saying he wasn't staring at you. He may be just staring into space, having nothing to do with you. Take it from me...I've become something of an expert in having women be not interested in me.   
&gt;note: while I was there, there were health code violations that did effect my health...  I imagine that this person was just instructed by a lot of "officials" on what to do and promised complete anonymity under so-called whistle blower laws that really don't do anything and has only resulted in further retaliation when the company can easily find out who reported them because OSHA is a flat out joke. --I had a similar experience when I worked at a new restaurant that deteriorated fast and would have made the places on "kitchen nightmares" look like a hospital surgery room. 
Can a terrorist bomber be a victim of his own bomb blast?
I don't think dolphin's have society or culture. The apparent brutality of the dolphins is not incidental.. it has been observed in Europe and America. Whether or not you think such behavior is typical, that it exists at all is very significant.  &gt;As a side note, you seem to be quite interested in "negative" aspects of behaviour.  For now it's a behavioral mystery, which is fascinating. More to the point.. this thread has seen echoes of the mistaken sentiment Dolphins are somehow our moral/social superiors. I think this is new age bullshittery.. and *that* interests me much more than any mere 'aspects of behavior'.
&gt;Slideshow Enlarged  hehehehehehe
Wow... full metal jacket doesn't even make this list.
Do it
potassium is used as the thing that stops your heart from beating in lethal injections so the warning is not to overdue it because you can die. I'm taking slightly over the daily value in just pill form (~30 pills), but you eat potassium in food throughout the day as well, so im probably  consuming about twice the recommended daily value.  It honestly works better than adderall for my concenctration, although adderall is like a better version of coffee for staying awake. 
He's an astroturfing rat, probably in the direct employ of Microsoft's PR company.
Yeah?  So what are you going to do about it?  Huh?  Doesn't reality suck.
You're probably looking for swank. And if you're using SLIME in Emacs, then you're already using it.
She might have to take a Cleveland Steamer to the next town to find it.
Some dude did new logos for a lot of subreddits.
It requires external support way after 22 weeks/24 weeks. Survival without the mother without mechanical support is not even guaranteed after 9 months. The only fundamental difference is our technology can not keep someone alive beyond a certain point.  The reason I use this as the cut off point for the way I look at it is I think it would be morally unacceptable for me to go past someone who is suffering without trying to help. If we can save someone, then we should, if their quality of life is such that it would not be a torture to keep them alive.  
Ah, then I retract my downvote.
One day I thought "Dude, Enigmocracy."  And now everything I do online is under that handle.
Way to make preteens who are already wary of their bodily changes fear their own bodies even more. Hugging is bad and dangerous! Bodies should not touch, they are bad.
must...find...torrent
&gt; only caning school boys and not girls was discriminatory  Not caning either would resolve the dilemma. What's wrong with making boys clean toilets as well?
How about pro- or anti- compulsory pregnancy?
Downmod for astroturfing.
It's not that hard, not like it takes rocket appliances.
Sorry, it had to be done, http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/8oq9e/there_is_this_really_cute_girl_at_the_library/
Killing is fine, torture's OK, thank god we have christians
I just wanted to help :(
Pixel art is rarely big
Don't we all.
Here, Here! I plug in dead dogs that I strangle with USB cable to the computer. I went through countless amount of dead dogs and all ubuntu versions since breezy. None of them were fucking detected by the system. What a piece of crap!   I tried asking on forums and mailing lists. The douchebags there were all like "you don't connect dead dogs to computers". Fuck you! You don't, I do, the system should detect that. Works flawlessly with my Mac and Windows.
"anybody get more out of this than me?"  No.  It seems like a scam to me.
This is interesting. My home state hasn't been budging on medical marijuana, so it's been my get-rich-quick scheme for at least a year to drop everything and move to California to work in a dispensary and relax. I've heard conflicting things about whether the industry is growing or dying.  Are there a lot of new dispensaries opening up or would it be really hard to break into that having no experience? Does an Oaksterdam degree do anything?  On that note, was it markedly different from a normal job interview?  Is anyone making money off this, or are all dispensaries non-profit?
Wrong.  [According to IMDB](http://www.imdb.com/chart/bottom), the best of the worst is [Chairman of the Board](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0118836/)
act your class, not ghetto. 
Submitter needs to change "Plugins" to "Modules"
A rare double whammy of mistakes! 
&gt;Their next :(... what an asshole. Nobody like that really believes in god.  Actually, it's quite possible they believe in god much more than you do, but just don't have the same vision of god that you do.   The 911 guys didn't do it just to be assholes. Terrorism is a faith based organization.  
The sad thing is, is that I really can't tell.
The tactic as used to intimidate doctors into refusing abortion services easily falls under "terrorism." Politics doesn't necessarily mean who you vote for.  Regardless, "terrorism" doesn't always have to be effective anyway. It hardly ever is.
Ah, I don't know it, sadly.
hidden payroll taxes   28%+ federal income taxes   7%+ state income taxes  9.5% state sales tax  18.4 cent/gal gas tax  taxes on my phone bill, cable bill, gas bill,  electric bill  pass-thru taxes on all goods and services  fees  etc,etc,etc  And those scum are broke and still want more.  Do I really need to be rich to say "fuck this, I've had enough".
DO NOT let the cat use your hand as a chew toy. When they are kittens you think it's cute that they nibble on your finger...get the cat a chew toy or they will never stop biting your hand.  get the cat used to brushing now! Don't overfeed - easier to keep a cat at a good weight than trying to lose weight later
Probably variations on [this one](http://fortsanders.net/files/unicorns.jpg).
I only use linux for the time being (debian and xubuntu with gnome and fluxbox resp.). I'm planning on trying ubuntu netbook remix on my soon-to-arrive-netbook, and I may keep the copy of XP that is preinstalled. Not too sure about the latter as I haven't really used windows for any extended period of time for many years.  edit: "extended" has an 'x'.
I will downvote myself for saying so, but I couldn't upvote you enough.
For Reference: [http://www.commarts.com/exhibit/swedish-fish-friend-you-eat.html](http://www.commarts.com/exhibit/swedish-fish-friend-you-eat.html)
Won't it be awesome to have the government commit untraceable cyberattacks on its own citizens for the most arbitrary of offenses? 
some they just start wanking off!
Makes us
I'll sabotage your respiratory system.
So much for the naive and unrealistic *"Nuclear weapons free"* world that Obama was talking about a few weeks ago. It's like if N. Korea actually detonated that bomb to make Obama look like a giant idiot.
third post down (reddit tv)  [posted by Alexis [kn0thing]](http://blog.reddit.com/)  oh and the whole beat your ass part was a joke....lighten up ;)
Smell your armpits repeatedly. 
They have plenty on Cain, but it's pretty awful:  &gt; This also means that Cain’s wife was a descendant of Adam. She couldn’t have come from another race of people and must be accounted for from Adam’s descendants.  &gt; We’re not told when Cain married or many of the details of other marriages and children, but we can say for certain that Cain’s wife was either his sister or a close relative.  ...  &gt; Some say that you can’t marry your relation. Actually, if you don’t marry your relation, you don’t marry a human! A wife is related to her husband before they are married because all people are descendants of Adam and Eve—all are of one blood.  &gt; A closer look at the Hebrew word for “wife” in Genesis reveals something readers may miss in translation. It was more obvious to those speaking Hebrew that Cain’s wife was likely his sister. (There is a slim possibility that she was his niece, but either way, a brother and sister would have married in the beginning.)  ...  &gt; [Biological Deformities] did not apply to Adam and Eve. When the first two people were created, they were perfect. Everything God made was “very good” (Genesis 1:31). That means their genes were perfect—no mistakes. But when sin entered the world because of Adam (Genesis 3:6), God cursed the world so that the perfect creation then began to degenerate, that is, suffer death and decay (Romans 8:22).
Inspired by: http://www.reddit.com/r/programming/comments/8omev/the_speed_size_and_dependability_of_programming/
The United States isn't in the best position to do much about it.  China is the nation in the best position to pressure North Korea into growing up.  
Wow, the first movie that came to mind was Scarface. I guess that was just the first movie I was aware of that used that much profanity, and made a drinking game out of it. 
A good point well made.
I find it cute that you can still get excited over anything indiana jones...  I miss being a kid... even escalators were fun back then...  sigh
This should be posted in /r/IAmA
There was just this one thing that I couldn't ever give up.
But what does Glenn Beck have to gain from less tax money being payed to the public?
Sounds like you had some problems with your past Cadbury egg trees?
How very christian of them.
One of them fakes the smile?
Power corrupts. There are no exceptions.
Also, posts as yours are good as well. Keep representing the rational voice and show the world that religion does not consist of radical extremists only. Certainly your voice alone will probably not reach as many as a big expensive poster would, but it's cheap and works for our demographic.  However, get enough people of the same mindset as you voicing your stance and you will overrun, or better yet COUNTER the nutjobs; Ideas spread. Never let extremists loose without dissenting voices crying out with the same force. Free speech is important for a reason. Lazy people are the reason why it dies, from their inaction of voicing up against those who wish to kill it. 
It's the journey, not the destination.
Wrong fundies, son.
Or most Israeli military operations...
That's hilarious. I'm glad that in Massachusetts people keep their god to themselves.   from personal experience in church growing up, about 3 out of 4 priests are good people.  They were just trying to help people and their community, and did a lot more good toward that end than many of us will for our own community.  the 3 good ones were married with families, one of which was a woman. that being said, the fourth who failed was unmarried and was defrocked for using his position as an official at seminary to coerce students into having sex. The good thing about the church of Atheism is that I don't have a priest anymore.  25% unethical is still kinda lousy stats.
devolution?
They better get the heck out of there before the Dianoga gets them...
Yessir.
I have a poison garden.  Helleborus is my favorite denizen, and it also sounds kinda like my name,
Alice in Chains Unplugged 
I see what you did there.
Anyone else find this particularly ironic after Dr. Tiller's murder?
Actually... the only electric motorbike that is available currently (Vectrix) is going out of business so I'm calling bull on this article. Electric vehicle companies are struggling big time right now.
Is there a Freckle Subreddit?
My personal favorite is BikeTiresDirect.com. They ship via USPS to Canada which (as opposed to UPS) which results in savings on customs duties. BikeSomeWhere.com is an alternative as is Amazon.com.  Other online stores which are popular are ProBikeKit.com (PBK) and Wiggle.com, both based in the UK. There have been complaints in some online bike forums about credit cards being jacked at PBK though.
To extend on jebus' position: the aspects of religion that have contributed good to society are not exclusive to religion. Specifically I'm thinking of community, networking, social actions like shelters and food kitchens, and other similar activities.  I would prefer if we separated religion as a community organization and religion as superstition and pseudo-science. In the context of abortion and Tiller's assassination, it seems clear that the former (bad) part of religion is responsible, and that's what SMB's comment appears to suggest, at least to me.  Edit: typo
uproarious! i did love it! thank you so much, BabyDicks
What's worse than a dead baby tied to a tree? A dead baby tied to two trees. 
Have a bottle of wine handy. Next time she's over, invite her and your roommate for a glass. You'll know soon enough.
A bad pun with my name. So perfect for reddit.
He started by mentioning "British Reuters" in an attempt at the lowest common denominator with an Irish audience.  You just know if the report was British he would have said it was an anti-Catholic agenda. In fact he nearly went there with his talk of "agendas" which in Ireland is a bit like saying the Vatican has an anti-Catholic agenda.  The man is clearly a batshit crazy bigot.
I love you.
When I was a kid I wanted to be a translator and ambassador for extraterrestrials. But then, when I became an adult, I realized that was just a childish fantasy, and decided that it was more realistic for me to just be a translator for extraterrestrials.
Fuck Havlat, he's worthless. I'll gladly take Kane though.
If he's using a bluetooth device, you can maybe just send him a link to this Reddit thread.   Or hack the library's WiFi, and send him a message that appears in large, blinking red letters on his laptop screen. 
Loads of porn, but I got told off for posting that last nighr
Our programmer may understand better(or at all) but I'll check it out.
ugh. First off, I meant the devout atheist thing as a sort of joke, but let's move past that. Why people on reddit have to nitpick the smallest things is beyond me, especially when much of the time those little things are meant as sarcasm or as a joke.   I'm not saying that I am absolutely right on the issue, I'm just stating what I believe would help the pro-life movement and what I believe to be immoral. I'm not telling a woman that she can't have a late term abortion, and I'm not saying that it should be outright outlawed, I even made special mention of an extenuating circumstance that would make late term abortion necessary. But like it or not, by the later terms of pregnancy, even when the baby is still inside of the mother, it has fully formed, it does feel pain and IMO it is fucked up to kill it. It is alive. It has a heartbeat. Define what alive is and that baby will fit your description.   My point is that if a woman is going to have sex (she is), she should KNOW what she would do case she gets pregnant. It would be immature to not even give thought to it. Do you honestly think it's cool to just sit around for months letting the baby form into a person inside of you while you decide whether or not to get an abortion? That is a decision that ideally should be made right away, once you know. This is a conversation that I have had with every single one of my girlfriends. That is because I am an adult and I would never tell my girlfriend what to do with her body. If a girl says she won't have an abortion or doesn't know, chances are I'm not gonna be having much sex with her because I don't want to get into this situation. Partners should be on the same page about this. Why is it wrong for me to say that people should think about this?   I'm sorry, but there have to be some regulations on abortions. It's a democracy after all and we need to come to a middle ground, to an agreement. We can't just say that it is absolutely OK to have an abortion at any time and we can't say that it is NEVER OK to have an abortion. Those are the two extremes of the argument and I think that both of those are immoral and wrong.  Just think. It boggles my mind how anybody wouldn't know what to do right away, how anybody would wait until late term to get an abortion. That's unfair. At a point, that fetus does become a living being, even if it hasn't experienced anything yet.   I'm done. I won't reply anymore. Say what you want but this is the exact reason why I rarely comment on abortion, because EVERYBODY is so hard headed about this. Nobody is ever willing to follow me to that middle ground (well, sometimes, but rarely). It's attitudes like these that have made this issue such a "hot button" topic that will likely never come to a conclusion. People are just unreasonable. Sure, in a perfect world I would NEVER EVER even consider telling anybody what to do with their own body. But this is not a perfect world, and people have been known to do some seriously fucked up shit. So sorry, I can't say that a person can do WHATEVER they want with their body, at some point, for society to be able to function, there has to be some sort of limits set. 
Polar bears and penguins, too?
My name is Marcus.  A friend called me "that Unrealious guy" and I liked it.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Marcus_Aurelius
Buttsex.
You wouldn't really care.
How do you think this person got their information? Someone else told him/her.   Why should we let someone stay naive and uneducated? Let's make this world a better place.
chappelle explains this as black bush:  "HE TRIED TO KILL MY FATHER!"
Mine is to remind me not to spend too much time on Reddit.
Agnostics who know what the hell they are talking about do not claim to be "not atheist".  However, you are free to put additional descriptors on atheism, like agnostic....or tall.
Really informative. Thanks!
Supersonic flying? Hell I was counting on hypersonic flight so I could visit Australia.  I could never stand a flight that long without it.
AP - Pakistan says it is close to beating the Taliban in the Swat Valley, but battlefield success alone does not equal victory: Militant commanders are still at large, local governments and police forces have been decimated and millions of residents are displaced from their homes.
Not familiar with the monolith, and not aware of any "official connections" to any existing well known conspiracies, but I'm in no place to say what exactly it is/was. I really know very little of the matter, just enough to be dangerous and horrified.
He's after a Darwin award.
Were you in Moscow when you met these Israelis?
The Java applet stole the focus and wouldn't let me touch anything else in the window. Because of the error with Javascript being unresponsive I couldn't click trust or don't trust until I stopped the script first, which I couldn't do because Java wouldn't let me focus on anything else.   I had to force quit Firefox because of it. 
I get that a lot on my campus too, you're not alone. :(
...sure
No.
And what would you like as its replacement ? I know it's "cool" to knock Flash but I will take a Flash video or Flex app over QT, ActiveX, Silverlight or Java any day.
"blogspam"? Why is YouTube (owned by Google) preferable to a link that puts this delightful anti-bigotry tune in an appropriate political context?  I'm always pointing to original sources, because I think creators and primary publishers deserve the credit, but it's possible to do that without dissing the sites (*many* of them blogs) that help disseminate good alternative content.  Also, the blog-hate around here is getting seriously out-of-date. You don't want to be the last one clinging to the 2009 version of "ur so ded, noob", do you?   
Explosm style!
[The same, but with text](http://www.kangaroo-protection-coalition.com/kangaroo-swim.html)
Maybe cheapshot him in the head less and he'll play better
This is a good point, and one that is practiced in my current company; however, it's proven to be all talk and no action.  If you had to ballpark it, how long would you generally let someone take on new responsibilities before promoting them?  If they didn't meet your standards, would you tell them why or fabricate excuses?
Horses hit?  Horses hit what?  I don't get it.
OK, rape is rape.  But what we are talking about here is a policy of rape.  That is another thing entirely.  Also, we do not "just let rape go."  Rapists are criminals and are prosecuted as such.  Whereas the people responsible for this policy of rape are walking free.
[Sometimes the ideas come a little too easily.](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/8oq9f/swedish_fish_ad_campaign_a_friend_you_can_eat_pic/)
don't we all?
When was that, like 1928?
[Here's](http://scitation.aip.org/getabs/servlet/GetabsServlet?prog=normal&amp;id=PLRAAN000079000003030303000001&amp;idtype=cvips&amp;gifs=yes) the source. Next step is getting a working NAND gate, I suppose.
I wish they'd switch to the metric calendar!
These guys totally ripped off my summer camp counselor. =)
[Emperor Norton I.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Emperor_Norton)
"You are handing them the 2x4 to beat you with…"  Such an awesome quote.
Communications.  Pretty  broad haha.
That's where the imagination part kicks in.
At least he has a car.
Eh, run XP in Virtualbox for one program that won't run in wine. (A utility for work), and to test IE 6,7,8. If you're a web dev, can't get away from the other platforms.
That massive spending is what needs to be cut. The budget for the welfare program has shrunk since '95.   I'll complete your little anecdote. Government raises taxes on the rich. The rich increase lobbying efforts increasing spending. Recession happens. Instead of getting rid of the increased spending due to lobbying they get rid of welfare.  That said i should probably rephrase my original dichotomy.  cut spending on things the poor needs OR  cut spending on things the rich want.
You should photoshop it. My mom offered to paint me any painting I wanted for Christmas so I asked for a picture of me showing off my prize winning Utah raptor, 4h style. [Turned out pretty well](http://susanlivengood.com/blog/wp-content/uploads/2008/11/11-19b.jpg).
Looks like Seamonkey
No kidding.  Always knocking on my door early on Sunday mornings to tell me the Good News that there might or might not be a God.
For those in the US, it's on the 101 network on direct tv and many of the latest season are on demand.  Other than that, Netflix has older season and the movie. "I hate to be the one to say I atoad a so, but fucking I atoad a so."
Well thank you. I think, personally, that this right-wing extremism is just as silly as those on the right calling the left extremists. Crazy people will be crazy no matter what ideals they latch onto. I'd much prefer pro-life hypocrite murderer, quite says it all. 
&gt;This was a female-dominated school, where natural boyish behavior was supressed and they were made to learn French. lolwut?
Don't worry; it'll wait
'cause he was RICH. (I hope)
you can delete your account now grammarnazi
Seems like we have a new server side javascript web framework every week.  Is *anyone* actually using them?
she was in the water that long??
A woman has just finished giving birth.  The doctor looks her in the eye, holds the baby by the foot, and swings it head-first into the wall.  He smashes it into the steel tray, against the floor, and then spikes it like a football, shouting out "It's a BOY!".  The woman is screaming and crying.  "WHAT THE FUCK ARE YOU DOING!?  WHAT THE FUCK DID YOU JUST DO TO MY BABY?!?!"  The doctor reached for the door, looked over his shoulder, and replied "Ahhhh'm just fucking with you.  He was already dead when he came out."
A sea monster... [ATE MY ICE CREAAAAAM!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=79c5JKjAQFg)
... well, are you hideous?   I mean, maybe she's got a guy, dude. Or she's a lesbian. Or she picked up some guy in a library once and he stole all her money out of her bank accounts and won't go through that again.  Or maybe she's really a guy.
Unless he has the fridge stocked full with peanut butter and jelly. Then he's a genius.
Suggestion: look for the advice of someone who has herself or himself succeeded in putting off a lot of weight. 
So North Korea is going to train donkeys to bite off Americans weiners?  In that case, hope they chop up Kim Jong Il and make him into chili.
you could drink lots of it and die or stop drinking it and die possibly a small time later than you would had you kept drinking it.  either way, you'll die eventually so why not do what makes you happy and imbibe that shit, yo
A great retro remake. Drive your car around the windy track, collecting up all of the gifts. It'd be easy if not for the suicidal cars trying to ram you. Good luck!
I read this thread right before watching porn. The emotions were...weird.
How did you manage to leave the 'A' out of "What" and "that" but you placed it in both "habit" and "addicted"?  I'm just curious is all. :]
Mmmmm, DB Float....
You are in a subreddit where the main point is to discuss things regarding atheism. If you think there are more important things, feel free to go to the lolcat subreddit instead.  Have a nice day.
I thought the same thing.  Mainly because the roller appears to have paint on it, and the other paint is achieved through cutout.  How did they get the roller to appear "sky colored" while having the shape and shadow?
But they like to pretend that the govanator is a republican even though he votes and acts like a wild liberal. Then again I suppose a California republican is about equal to a southern democrat.
The Warner Bros. cartoon characters. How could the world not love us? Here's a list. That's all folks:  Bugs Bunny  Daffy Duck  Porky Pig  Elmer Fudd  Pepe Le Pew  Foghorn Leghorn  Sylvester  Yosemite Sam
Sigh, after all this time, I still find myself gullible on the internet. 
Almost identical story here. Junior in college, started using this name in 5th grade when I started playing Diablo. Used it ever since. 
They have Windows and Linux versions, but no Mac version. Hmm. :-/  EDIT: I see the Mac version is forthcoming now.
Endoskeleton from Terminator.  Should probably have said Arnie instead.
Oh yeah...  Say it slower...
More like Sweeten!  Am I right?
They're still going http://comics.com/bc/  As is too Wizard of Id http://www.gocomics.com/wizardofid
http://www.marcellosendos.ch/comics/ch/1995/12/19951226.gif
Another little known fact is that the Religion library is based on object oriented concepts. Each ReligionType is also a class that can extend and create copies of itself, and the end result is a framework that allows unlimited variety and can handle extremely complex dynamic relationships.   It also has a pretty sweet AJAX interface written in Visual Basic.
That's a reasonable trade-off for hundreds of women in my area looking for sex tonight.
haha, I forgot about this, great stuff
Takes a special kind of lady to entertain such an experiment, don't you think?   A "KEEPA!" &lt;/australian accent&gt;
Very concise. Watch what you say in earshot of Republicans though humpty, they might make sure you *have a big fall.*
register for free to see and to add comments.
I like the Dilbert cartoons.. except for Kathy Griffin's voice.
Oh no!! Water we going to do?
Peek at her screen so if you can see what thread she is in. Then post in there "i c u now" and "look around".
This made me grin so much when I saw it :D  Had the Amiga version &lt;3  Edit: And yeh, it was pretty hard.
Congratulations, you're an elitist douche.  
Don't want a cookie, Have a box of dunkin doughnuts next to me right now.  If you don't give a shit don't ask me anything. if you have questions then ask. I don't need anyone's approval, why are you getting all flustered for.
As part of my PhD work, I had to cut the thymuses out of live newborn mice. You can imagine what a painstaking job that was. But by the next morning their mother had eaten them all, probably because of the smell of blood.  So I switched to a computer project! &lt;G&gt; The worst that happened was sometimes the card reader ate my deck. (Yes, boys and girls, this was a very long time ago.)
&gt; &gt; Y'know, if you want no one to sit next to you on a subway, all you have to do is just hang a piece of string out of your mouth.  &gt; Huh? is this an insult in the planet your thetans are from?   I got it from [the planet reddit](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/8oku4/i_once_heard_that_if_you_want_no_one_to_sit_next/) where they thought it was mildly amusing.   [See also here](http://showmeyourindies.com/indieflix/indieflix-blog/interview-with-alan-abel-and-his-daughterfilmmaker-jenny-abel/) Humans did too.  Sunlight.  You need sunlight.  Something for Vitamin D.
He's not a terrorist - he's an ideologically-motivated murderer.  But... so is a terrorist.  Just goes to show that the word "terrorist" is too broad and ultimately meaningless.  Every violent act inflicts some measure of terror in somebody.  
tch tch tch
Choice you can believe in.
Well thats basically carbonated sugar water. You'll piss a lot ad get super fat.  edit: I'm totally wrong abut the sugar in regards to 'diet'. And really in the states its high fructose corn syrup more often anyhow.
So we went to the address and the guy who answered the door was obviously very very high on something. He was pretty insistent that he did not in fact own a cat, nor did he ever. Guess we have a cat now?
What you suggest is what I'd see as the likely source of downvotes on anti-Muslim articles if it were happening rather than it being the atheists as MSDN suggests.
Diet Coke will forever be one short of the market it could have had.
cool and freaky
Use inter-reddit communication! http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/8oq5c/reddit_help_im_at_the_library_and_a_guy_keeps/
Took me about 2 days to download but it was worth it. 
A low APR plus an arrangement fee would work, I guess it depends on what happens if the loan is not repaid (do they wait a year before going after you for large and, given you needed a loan for £200 in the first place, destructive amount?). The UK neither limits the amount of interest chargeable, nor whether a loan can be rolled over,  however it does require clear advertising of the APR (as in this case) and the consumer credit act does offer protections to consumers and limit lending (especially in cases where the lender is aware that the borrower would be unable to pay off the balance of any given loan).
My mother is schizophrenic, and while she 'knows' that she has the disorder, she doesn't really believe it, and will instantly stop taking her medication if she's not carefully watched each day, as she alternates between believing it's a placebo and believing it's poison.  If you tell her she's schizophrenic and that the things she hears are part of her disorder, if she's medicated she will say 'I know...but' and go on and on about how she feels like it's real. If she's unmedicated she will yell, scream, and cry about how she's not sick, people are really after her.  For those who are severely mentally disordered, there really is no understanding that it's a mental problem.   I'm not necessarily arguing that religious people are all insane, but they certainly believe what they believe strongly and with no stronger physical evidence to back it up than my mother has for her beliefs.
Oh, OK, haha..
Nah, that was about a generation too late.
&gt; Without some ultimate moral authority "morality" is a meaningless concept.  How so? I know of know ultimate temperature authority yet "hot" and "cold" have plenty of meaning.  &gt; The very idea of morality implies some universal or transcendent code that we all should live by  The idea of morality is indeed that it is authoritative, but how is a "universal or transcendent" quality required? Can there not be multiple authorities?   &gt; so if everyone can make up their own moral code the idea of a moral person is no more than "I'm a moral person because I say I am."  You seem to think morality is either completely objective or completely subjective. I would say it's neither; it is relative.  &gt; Not saying that atheists are incapable of following "the golden rule", but if they don't then who's to judge?  I suppose that depends on what you mean by "judge". I judge with my own moral compass all the time, as do you I'm sure. But I don't think that's what you meant.
I've never heard of any similar rule in the US, but the vast majority of people are taught to drive by their parents or a professional instructor, so it wouldn't come up much.
Fair enough point, but what would you say is an appropriate response then? Ignoring them does nothing, now you say calling them out only makes them stronger. Kind of a shitty catch-22 no?
Saying that there are right-wing extremists is not the same as saying that all right-wingers are extremists. Dumbass.  (Most right-wingers talk a good fight, but don't have the balls to actually become the extremists their rhetoric would suggest)
I was probably around 12 years old, and I was signing up for XBox live. I kept trying to come up with a gamertag, but I just couldn't get one that wasn't taken. Finally, it auto-suggested KillerFuzzball for some reason. I thought it was funny, so I took it.   Now, I just use this for any site where my first initial and last name is too formal.
[PROTIP](http://www.tylenol.com/product_detail.jhtml?id=tylenol/pain/prod_pm.inc&amp;prod=subppm)
Silly goose!  Of course it is O.K.!
&gt; I have no idea why anti-Islam articles get more downvotes [citation needed]  http://www.reddit.com/r/atheism/comments/8ceze/islamist_trolls_are_massdownvoting_every/  I don't know whether this is actually accurate or not BTW, but it would be *really* interesting if someone could do a statistical analysis of whether stories about certain religions score higher in the downvote stakes compared to others. 
Facebook crashes Chrome consistently on my windows box. Click a notification on the new Ajax-ey toolbar on the bottom, and Chrome just flatlines. I think Facebook's programmers have been slacking off lately.
It took way to much scrolling for me to find this, but thank you. 
Thing about people is, they have a funny habit of moving when you make their taxes too high. You can't keep raising taxes indefinitly, eventually you got to learn you cant have every single thing you want (even if the intention is good). America isn't made of magic, we may be the richest country but we cant just magically pay for everything dreamed up.   Sooner or later people need to be able to take responsibilty for themselves.
[Indeed.](http://imgur.com/ac0xB.jpg)  http://www.commarts.com/exhibit/swedish-fish-friend-you-eat.html
translated (badly)  http://translate.google.com/translate?prev=hp&amp;hl=en&amp;js=n&amp;u=http%3A%2F%2Fdrugoi.livejournal.com%2F2953852.html&amp;sl=ru&amp;tl=en&amp;history_state0=
tbh, I like to hack around with my kernel and other software occasionally, and I'm not a big fan of Macs in general, so I really want something Linux based.
I think he's going to some church in Kansas...
Ummm.  Didn't you read the article?
&gt; Who are the good guys and who are the bad guys in this case?  Good Guys: US, ROK  Bad Guys: DPRK  Simplistic does not mean wrong.
Last but not least.  Like I said before,  Wal mart,  Roanoake Rapids, North Carolina,   you have one american flag in your right hand and one in the top part of the the basket.  You will go by Slaughter, I will go by Truth.  A meeting at a public place is better.   The Truth Of The Matter From A White Guy 
Why?  For movies flash should be unnecessary. Full flash websites are tacky and inaccessible. Other uses of flash can easily be done using javascript.  There are only a few things I see flash as truly needed for, but when it comes down to it I'd rather use Silverlight for it so that I don't have to touch actionscript.
One or more functions that work together to solve a problem.
Obviously.
Would would the other 1/10th of a corp do?
The vet can test for it.  If the cat has it then you need to get tested and one or both of you can take medication to clear it up.
Because it's about national interest and not moral arbitration you fucking idiot.
I have to say, you seem to have very low comprehension, and the emotional barrage of words you spout only serve to re-inforce that you seem to have something invested in THS... making you a schill.  You failed to read, digest or understand any of the information I have written. The funniest part of it all is that you have no real experience to back up your words. You yourself have no experience visiting other shelters. You have been to THS one time...
"HEY NEEDLE DICK, WHAT THE FUCK ARE YOU LOOKING AT? YOU'RE FUCKING UGLY, PLEASE GO DIE IN A FIRE!!!"  That will probably take care of the little problem.
And Xara Xtreme is better than Illustrator. http://www.xara.com/products/xtreme/
That's an example of what I'm talking about. By ridiculing people, and then saying that they're doing it to themselves, you get yourself off the moral hook and feel free to ridicule at will.
Say "Hey, you use reddit? Me too. Did you read the story about..."  Just talk to her, man.
what
I think an act of violence intended to intimidate or cause terror is terrorism. Which is exactly what this is.
*Wow*  &gt; Because of intense evolutionary indoctrination, many people today have the idea that their generation is the most advanced that has ever been on this planet. Just because we have jet airplanes and computers doesn’t mean we are the most intelligent or advanced. This modern technology is really a result of the accumulation of knowledge.  &gt; We must remember that our brains have suffered from 6,000 years of the Curse. We have greatly degenerated compared to people many generations ago. We may be nowhere near as intelligent or inventive as Adam and Eve’s children. Scripture gives us a glimpse of what appears to be advanced technology almost from the beginning.
Are you wanting to learn ice hockey, roller hockey or ball hockey? Because they are all very different. But the best way to learn them all is just take the plunge and play. In every rec adult league I have ever played in, there have been brand new players, so don't feel too self-conscious.
Remember Kramer's coffee table book? Good times.
Go into her bedroom, get under the covers and snuggle up to her.  If she doesn't run screaming from the room, she's seduced you.  Next question, please.
alt answer: one dead baby skewered on 37 huge steel spikes.   =D
I'm American and I got that... does that make me cool now?
about
Thanks for restoring some of my faith in this subreddit.
Ah, `tapply` seems to be the ingredient I was missing :)  I may be mistaken, but R is one of the least-well documented languages I've tried to learn :(
That's racist! &lt;/meme&gt;
I apologize for the shitty scanned image. I found this article today after going through some old magazines. I started reading this out of amusement, but after about mid-way though my amusement turned to anger. To me it's like finding the warning signs only after the catastrophe has occurred.
i thought i was listening to an old john lennon record.
your
Yeah, she's trying to seduce you, and I am sending you a check for $10,000.
Even if this is true, it doesn't mean that Obama has to cover for Bush.  He could come out and show the paperwork (if there even is any) that grants the CIA retroactive immunity, and let the legislature and the judiciary decide what to do with it.  That would be the open and transparent government that we were promised.
Version control, iterations, iteration goals, users, someone to discuss it with
Thanks for the link. Images like that always make me kinda teary-eyed, in a good way. Seeing how vast the world outside our tiny planet is blows my mind.
Man 1: "I have a new theory of gravity!" Man 2: "Prove it." Man 1: "Go and do the research to prove me right."  See, in this here example you're Man 1 and seem to be unaware how silly your response is.
I'm getting sick of these disgusting claims.. these people, these CHRISTIANS should start reading their bible and its history a little less literally and pay more attention to its basic principles.  You DO NOT create sweeping generalizations to condemn others who do not agree with you, you DO NOT create lies as evidence of your ideologies honesty and you DO NOT claim to be the truth when history can refute you in one minute of argument.  Enough with this religion, it is time to end the joke. CHRISTIANITY has NOTHING NEW within its books that has not already been told.. this sentence if not false in the slightest and you should ask why that is.  Christianity has copied ALL its belief system from others.. find out why.  If you want to find God, then start looking.
Well played sir.  I can't give you a loan but I did up you one.
That there is christian terrorism, yes.  That, as you stated, "There have been more acts of terrorism committed by christians in the name of jesus than any other religion--in modern times and in the past," no actually, I find nothing.
Says who? Government trolls who want to start WWIII?
I was also big on learning mythology as a child, mostly Greek and Roman, but some Native American too. it never occurred to me that the bible and my favourite mythological stories were in the same category, but even as a child I was fairly grounded in reality, and knew all of them were false.. but still fun to read. still love reading it, but if I was going to read the bible, I'd like to learn Hebrew and read an original, untranslated version. also, your name made me chuckle.
[Here's another one.](http://imgur.com/2pKIq.jpg)
Most likely. You can also purchase charms at most Shinto shrines for safe driving, good luck, general well-being, etc. [Here's one I picked up in Japan last month](http://howheels.org/webimages/misc/hkcharm.jpg).
half the stuff they put up on tab sites comes with the heading:  "this is my first tab, not sure if its right but it sounds awesome on an acoustic when you're wearing tevas."
Your point only stands if all steel toe boots are made equal and are all in the same condition.  The real world has a way with making things happen that don't nicely fit into pre-conceived ideas or what is indicated by controlled experimentation.  Spend a couple years on an ambulance, for example, and you'll understand.  Edit with specifics for clarification: I've picked up people who have had their foot run over in regular shoes that had broken bones and crushed tissue.  I've picked up people in steel toe boots who had their foot run over and were largely fine.  I've picked up people in steel toe boots who have had their foot  run over and had the steel make matter worse, adding deep lacerations to the broken bones and crush injuries.
you can't load gravel with a pitchfork?
I just want to say, this issue is about people thinking they can use terrorism as a means to get their message across.  This is NOT saying that abortion is ok. It is shocking that I will get downmodded now, but more shocking that nobody will realise why.
username?
[Compojure](http://github.com/weavejester/compojure), but that's partially because I'm the main developer. I'd currently only recommend using it if you're feeling rather adventurous ;)  That said, it is very flexible, and in my opinion, has a more elegant basis than most web frameworks. When I'm working in RoR or ASP.NET MVC (the two frameworks used by my employer), I find myself missing Compojure's flexibility.
Well, if it is what my netbook wants... Seriously though, I've never gotten a chance to dick around with Arch. Maybe next year, when I understand it better.
Not necessarily. My test was semi-urban (stip-mall sort of place) and the only grade at all was in the parking lot. But yeah, pay really close attention to your speed on downgrades, especially with an automatic transmission (which won't limit your speed at all).
He'd better be careful messing around with jailbait.
Well, more than that. I started with a false premise, but accepted it as truth. Then I smudged the english result a bit. I'll simplify for explanation. A common example is the relationship between fire and oxygen.  P - There is a fire  Q - There is oxygen  P -&gt; Q - "If there is a fire, then there is oxygen"   The error that thtroyer pointed out is the attempt to assume ~P -&gt; ~Q. That is to say:  ~P -&gt; ~Q - "If there is NOT a fire, then there is NOT oxygen"   This is clearly false. Simply because there is not a fire does not mean there is not oxygen.   Now, this is where I made my joke. If P-&gt;Q is true, then ~Q-&gt;~P is always true. That is:  ~Q -&gt; ~P - "If there is NOT oxygen, then there is NOT fire."   And this makes immediate sense. You can't have a fire without oxygen. And it works in the real world, too, because P-&gt;Q is a valid premise.  But if we start with a false premise    ~P -&gt; Q - "If you do NOT believe in God, then your children will kill you"   and invert it  ~Q -&gt; P - "If your children do NOT kill you, then you believe in God"   you get an equally false premise, which for the joke, I treated as true. However, this statement really just means, "I can conclude that you believe in God because your children did not kill you" and flows logically if you assume the start (~P-&gt;Q) was true. I could have maybe written the English form more clearly, but it's logically valid, and is no different than, "I can conclude there is no fire on the moon because there is no oxygen on the moon."   But I chose to interpret "then" as we commonly do in conversational English. The statement, humorously became, "It will be considered that I have belief in God if my children don't kill me" or I suppose "God will conclude I believe in Him if my children don't kill me." And of course the assumption of the premise "If you believe in God, you will go to heaven." With this interpretation, the pathway to heaven is as simple as not falling victim to parricide. Logic allows an outside observer to infer knowledge ("Oh, he must have believed in God...") it doesn't make things true that aren't ("Oh, I guess I believed in God without even realizing!")  Rather long and probably over explained, but there you go ;)
Oh awkward, how bad would it be if you were actually that guy?  
The feeling of accomplishment.  Like how now that I don't need achievements to get the items, i downloaded a program to reset all my achievements so i can earn them the proper way.
Where the fuck is Zanesville?
How would you best express what LouF was trying to say?
well for a while my username was "jojoaclown"  but one day i was typing on a forum register thing real fast and it got all messed up and came out as "jojoalowsa" and i loved it :D  spoken as (Joe-Joe-a-LOW-sah)
I'd like to launch my taepodong at them if you know what I mean.
Hey now, don't lump me in with the conspiracy nuts.  I write software for a brokerage - believe me, I'm quite aware that volume spikes are perfectly normal.
Credit card?  Overdraft? There are cheaper ways of dealing with this, even for people with dire credit histories and poor bank balances.  Your bank will almost always offer low or even interest free lending in an emergency and generally will waive any fees if you notify them before they are incurred (i.e. call them to say that you think a cheque will exceed your overdraft and ask for help, rather than wait until you get a charge for going over drawn or for bouncing a cheque).
Wow… not again! Why can't you guys be original?
um, you could say, "please stop staring at me.  thanks."
It sounds like the boss may have been too narcissistic to even take that as a real threat so he kept doing it. That is assuming the employee did indeed tell him to stop as it sounds like he was saying.   In my case, I would have just simply had that as one further reason to quit and leave them on their ass. I also would have made that clear when confronting them on such an issue. It may have been that other than the health and welfare concerns he mentioned, that may have been the case and why the boss claims sabotage because he rightfully left them on their ass. But to be getting sued for it now, which can cause undue hardship for him and his family, lost jobs, etc. that is where things seem really f'd up. Which is why I posted this. 
The act wasn't carried out by a "movement" it was carried out by a person who may or many not be a member of a larger organization which engages in terrorism.  You can't just broadly define an umbrella of "movement" and then say that because the movement involves politics, that anyone committing a violent act under that umbrella is a terrorist.  That would make any Union member who engages in violence against "scabs" a terrorist.  The violence committed by anti-abortion groups is generally NOT intended to put pressure on political bodies, but to put pressure on private individuals outside of government.  The fact that they also want political change does not mean they are using violence to achieve that political change.  If anything, they are using violence to achieve social change, not political change, and while this definition may constitute torture for the FBI, it would not constitute torture to more discriminating government definitions.  I take issue with the lax manner in which the term "terrorism" is used by the government and private individuals in the US.  It's gotten so ridiculous that almost anything is now labeled "terrorism" and I don't think that's good in the long run.  We really have to see if this guy was a part of a larger conspiracy, and if his reason for committing this murder was a political one.  Until then, I'll hold off on pulling the "terrorism" trigger.
In case you or anyone else is interested, I found a few programs that will edit your mp3's without encoding. I downloaded [this one](http://www.freewareweb.com/cgi-bin/archive.cgi?ID=1717), and it was super easy to use. I'm pretty technologically challenged, so if I can figure it out right away, anyone can.  I'm listening to my trimmed down version of Jamie Foxx and it sounds perfect.
Except running on a treadmill makes you thinner, while playing WoW makes you fatter.   But in the aspect of where you go, yes, nowhere. 
I think rednecks and techie nerds would get along very well. I have been around a many redneck in my day and if there is something they admire it it's ingenuity, improvisation, and a willingness to do something stupid.
Oh, it is most definitely not atheists, or at least, to a certain degree.  Its generally apologetic "cultural relativists" who feel its inappropriate to criticize the stoning of women for getting raped in Iran because; 1) its not our culture to understand,  2) America and Israel does bad shit as well.
Xondar is hitting all the points I was trying to hit but doing a better job, however, I feel compelled to weigh in.  Restricting peoples freedom is not just arrogant it is one of the worst forms of abuse I can think of.   Just because you feel your ideas of morals and ethics are correct, doesn't give you the right to impose those beliefs on anyone else. Even in their defense. We certainly should protect people from other people in some situations from themselves.   For example. We should not allow someone to murder other people because it takes away from the victims freedom. We should stop a child from touching a hot stove because the child is not able to rationally form an idea of what is right or wrong for them. I would apply this to adults who are not capable of sound thought. Such as severe cases of mental disability.   However, there are millions upon millions of people who can think reasonably and understand the risks of of alcohol consumption. We do not stop them nor should we. As long as they are not taking away the freedom of another individual.   As I said in our other discussion, here is how I define freedom. Freedom is the individuals right to do anything they choose to do as long as they are not hurting anyone other than them self or someone that is willing to be hurt.   If Xonder and I knew each other in real life and he wanted to know what if felt like to punch someone and I volunteered my face, he could be arrested for aggravated assault. Hell, there is even a chance that I could be arrested. Is that right? We are both adults (at least I will assume Xonder is for sake of example) We are both able to reasonably make decisions concerning our well being. My face belongs to me. His fist belongs to him, no one should be able to intervene.   I have no interest in cutting my self, but I should not presume to take away from another persons freedom if they find scarification beautiful.   I have every interest in doing drugs. Even if it is to the point of abuse, you should not have the right to tell me what I can do with my body as long as I am not hurting anyone other than myself.   Religions of all sorts have been pushing their idea of morality upon everyone else for thousands of years. Even up to the point of death. That is wrong.  Again, an individuals freedom is more important than you imposing your moralities.   I only get this one life. I will not harm others, unless we both agree, and I will be damned if I let someone tell me what I can and can't do with my body. Your moralities have no governance on my freedom. Just because you believe something is wrong, immoral, or unethical doesn't make it true.
Install 1.9, use --program-suffix=1.9. Then do gem1.9 install all the gems you use and see what happens!
listen, just go - if you don't know now, you will know later. start with your general ed requirements and university graduation requirements. diversify as much as possible in your electives. eventually you will encounter a class that you love so much, you will be sucked in and that will become your major. in the process of getting there, you will be exposed to many different trains of thought and be a better person for it.  just go by default for the time being, your dream subject will come to you later.  p.s. I started at the age of 26, and finished at age 32 with 2 diplomas...so I know from some experience what you are about to go through.  edit: grammar
This question can not be answered without context.  Different zombies, from different "Universes" (as it were), rely on different senses to find prey.  * In the "Brian Keene" Universe ("The Rising", "City of the Dead"), Zombies can use the same senses that humans can, but they degrade at the expected rate.  The undead can also see our "aura", which is like a light. * In the "Max Books" Universe ("World War Z", "The Zombie Survival Guide"), the zombies use all senses equally, whereas humans have evolved to rely on sight. * In the "Simon Pegg" Universe ("Shaun of the Dead"), the zombies appear to be dim-witted versions of humans, being fooled by regular-smelling, regular-looking people, walking slowly and groaning. * In the "Alex Garland" Universe ("28 Days Later", "28 Weeks Later"), the zombies appear to rely on sight and sound.  Since there are so many ideas of what a Zombie is (Fast Vs. Slow, Mindless Vs. Thinking, etc), that you can't definitively say the truth.  In my opinion (which I believe is fairly sound, as I am somewhat of a "Zombie Connoisseur"), Zombies rely on all 5 senses, but they degrade over time.  All zombies, in all movies, seem to be drawn towards light, like a moth to a flame.  This indicates a reliance on sight.  It's obvious that they rely on touch, as they use appendages to grab and mutilate.  The sense of smell is seen in some Zombie Universes, but not all.  I would say that the zombies can use smell to find the general location of a human, but not exact (A pheromone-cloud effect, if you will).  Once it gets close, the sight is used to find prey.  *Edit: I define a Universe by the name of the first person to pen a novel/screenplay in said Universe.*
For PHP, Qcubed(http://qcu.be/) is one of the best OOP frameworks out there.  The code generation makes writing CRUD and many others functions obsolete, form handling is fantastic.
Guitar Unleashed.... www.guitarunleashed.com its for chords but its pretty close
HTML 5 and Web video?
"Well what about [other unrelated instance]?!" is never a good argument.
I don't get it.
&gt;It seems that Muslims and people from the Middle East are much more likely to bear the brunt of accusations of terrorism.  It would be great if they could nail someone who they thought was middle eastern and crow about it a bit then have it come out the bastard is lily white. That'd pour a little cold water on their fire.
Why do I have this picture of some dude with a large beard that kills anyone he tries to shave.   And there is a basement with lots and lots of dead bodies in it. I'm sure this says something about my personality. 
excellent!
Excellent show.  My current favorite.  Well written and on the edge.
Have you even checked your local bike shop? I can't imagine it'd be hard to find a black seatpost or a tall stem. Probably have some lightly used ones that'll be even cheaper.
He probably mentioned those things because those are common talking/stereotypical points about illegal immigrants. 
It was the name your father screamed as I raped him for the first time. God, what great memories!
I regularly click the article links on Reddit without reading them.  I read the picture, thought, "No, no it's not,".  Going back to the main Reddit page, I read the title.  I was amused to find that the submitter and I had the same reaction.
How do you know I'm not?  BTW your shoe is untied.
Who will fund clinical trials?
The Javascript has been screwy on Safari lately too, which is why I was trying to use Firefox. Did they change something recently?  For this particular problem, however, I think the Java applet is more of the problem. It forces itself to have the focus and won't give it up until you click it. However, it also won't let you click if there are other errors to be resolved. 
Agreed.  The new series in a fine starting place and can be rented through NetFlix, which is where I'm renting it.  If you enjoy it, check out Torchwood as well.
you could extol the liberal education provided by Reddit as the perfect precursor to the liberal education you'll receive from your new professors
And what are you doing about it beyond ranting anonymously in an online forum?  Are you going to talk to your church and have them publicly decry as a group, this violence?  Or will you do like most religious people do, and dismiss these nutjobs as "not true Christians" and go about your business?
Even if you are buckled up, your unbuckled passengers will still function as torpedoes in the event of an accident.  If you are a fat girl and you run into the back of someone in the middle of traffic that is stopped at a red light because you were texting, do not tell the person you hit that it's because you were feeling sick. You dumb bitch, I was watching you text right before you hit me.
Apparently you can't vote on articles more than 30 days old.  EDIT: [This is what I meant](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/8mqam/askreddit_why_are_votes_for_old_submissions_not/)
http://www62.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=new+horizons&amp;a=*C.new+horizons-_*DeepSpaceProbe-
I would probably say that english is the most important, but next would be languages such as german, and japanese. Mandarin would also be useful
you agree with that...? ok, um, can you tell me wTF it is supposed to mean?  My mind is going... DONKY, Carrot, lick, Stick WFT OMG... I mean SERIOUSLY!   
Two words:  Plastic surgery.
Actually, Chairman of the Board would be #100, making it the best worst movie (if that makes any sense).   #1 is currently [Night Train to Mundo Fine](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0060753/) which has a much lower rating than Chairman at 1.4. 
Ever read the bible?
Ok, guess you're not him, I'm wearing rain boots :-)
My uncle thinks these pipes would sell to head shops for 6 dollars, and ultimately sold to the consumer for $12-15  I kind of think he is crazy but he insists that they are quality handmade pipes that would make us a cash cow.  What do you think?  EDIT: two more pictures [1](http://imgur.com/0B6GC.jpg) [2](http://imgur.com/tvrC1.jpg)
The funniest thing is the question under the Utahraptor. It says, "What animals were related to it." That screams evolution.
Pretty much a ripoff of Agony
This calls everything into question. 
You can bet other christians won't call him a "christian" publicly.  Standard M.O. in situations like this.  It's always,  "he's not a true christian(tm)"
"Why is it hard to believe? This happens to all countries"  The US is the second oldest country in the world (by age of standing constitution), only after San Marino. It's been arguably dysfunctional since its founding. The problems we face now pale in comparison to those from several periods in the past, including the Civil War, the Depression of the 1870s, the Great Depression, and World War II. If history teaches me anything, it's that every stable country has its ups and downs. We're in a down period. 
How the fuck did this get upmodded?  You cannot use a political argument against irrational thought.  And your argument is invalid - even the most noble police officers have to use deadly force, but they do so because they believe they are protecting.  No, this argument is about domestic terrorism, plain and simple, and not about abortion.
If she can't afford the rusty trombone, then she should at least make him a Portuguese breakfast for his birthday.
[Monty Python said it better.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NQu_RRLbVDA)
You could put that you have extensive experience with social marketing, networking and news aggregation. Are you a moderator of a subreddit? (If not, go make one really quick) This would give you experience in building an online community while maintaining content standards 
D'oh.
Well, I guess if he survives and proves sea-worthy and has reproduced then perhaps he is evolving into a new species of sea-kangaroos.
So you're like the guy that always says "that's what she said"?
If you're on faceboook I wrote an airfare tracker using kayak to your friend list.  Search for "Flights to Friends".  Cheapest flight to all of your friends over the next month of weekends.
Why on earth would I so such a thing as that?
:DDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDD
Like I said, I bet you're absolutely delightful at dinner parties. 
Rotisserie. 
That stuff's good, but I love noise, too.
Citation please. The Mac Pro I own is the most easy to work on machine I've ever owned.
I do like the designs that appear to have braille on them.
This should be moved to the "semantics" subreddit.
Animal Collective is doing things that no one else is doing.  Every album sounds different and sounds like nothing you've heard before.  
Since 1095.
We are.
haha I am a linguist too  linguistics is definitely an amazing field that touches on every part of social science and philosophy...it incorporates so many types of thinking that you will always be stimulated!  I second this one!
Then you dumb fucks were scammed. Show me the laws, sir. Tell me that I can go ask my friends to go buy shit tax free. 
I have been riding for 25 years now, currently on a 5 or 6 year old S&amp;M Black Bike. I am thinking that I might need to retire it and build up something a little more current. 
'Them'?  Can you just give me a quick update - who are you talking about?
Cut the bullshit, that had to be a religious person who killed him.
&gt;When I was a broke student I'd sometimes use my debit card beyond my overdraft...  Did you ever call your bank before hand?  They will generally give you a short term extension of your overdraft or waive fees if you do (although they may also try and sell you a loan...).  It really is worth while talking to your bank (although I would suggest going into a branch rather than the call centers, the latter can be a little hit and miss).
Well then why'd they put that little button over there?
Nigger please
well, at least the ghost died happy, but it's too bad that his cpu didn't get a proper burial.  Those yellow cats are barbarians!
You will be upgraded.   All Hail the Cyber Controller!  
Sigh...
sudo rm -rf /  Just kidding, **DO NOT** do it.  I'd feel bad.
Why is their brand of psuedoscience considered more innocuous than, say, AIDS denialism?
Yeah, that whole "We are at war because our survival (unfortunately) depends on it" thing--not so much.  We manufactured reasons to go to war, because Bush and his cronies wanted an excuse to make a grab for Iraqi oil, wage a proxy-war with Iran, and see to his daddy issues.  We're still there because we destabilized the entire fucking country and we kinda need to clean up our mess.   And as for the reason that anyone would support tax increases, I would ask you to look at the article that this post is linked to.
Then she said she became promiscuous...  lol!
&gt; The problem is the future we got wasn't the future we were expecting.  Well, you guys had some pretty dumb expectations.
The palestinian is a boy.
two of my favorite body parts.
[Wikipedia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Miranda_rights) should help
As if one more were needed.
More like Ambien combined with some serious opiate based narcotics and a box to sleep in. Then it might *almost* be tolerable ;)
In...every photo. North Korea needs chiropractors. 
[Here](http://imgur.com/uudDw.jpg), it's kinda postmodern crappy version. Hope you like it. Happy birthday!
Honestly? I think you're phoning it in. I think you can do better. I HOPE you can do better.  I clicked on this link expecting an interesting twist on the representation of the seven deadly sins. Instead for 'greed' you have a skull with a dollar sign and 'greed' literally spelled out with stylized lettering.  Also in a time when we are going through a worldwide recession brought about by the greed of men wearing Saville Row suits, we have to realize that evil is done by normal people who look just like you and me.
What about astroturfing, trolling or when the opinion is framed in a deliberately insulting fashion?
It's a shortened version of my so-called 'porn name'.  You know, real middle name + street you grew up on.  
Indeed. I'm actually just about to start practicing a Fleet Foxes song on guitar.
&gt;Staff at the theatre were searching customers' bags for video equipment that could be used for movie piracy.   Piracy (read drinks and snacks)
I read it but only because I'm putting off studying (for an immunology final, strangely enough).  It's about what I expected except for the Suzanne Somers thing which was just horrifying.
Video: The infamous attempt to use explosives to remove a dead whale from a beach.  Still Photo: The infamous photo entitled "Government Work" of a dried-out roadkill opossum carcass with a yellow center-line painted smack across it.
I'm dead. The fact that I'm still dead converted me to atheism.
Yes, although the overlap between reddit-style atheists and them must be pretty low as redditors enjoy causing offense. =)
"Against shepherds in Pakistan they are."  Have you ever considered what a pilot could do without being limited by G-forces?
I devolve, I don't evolve... could be the other way round. I don't know. Revolve?
forgot to upvote
Yep, I created [/r/disapproval](/r/disapproval), and I'm a mod of [/r/bash](/r/bash).
You are correct good sir.
Yea, and I'm sure that had no bearing on someone wanting to gun the guy down...
I thought my dad was the only one that did this. Haa.
and, a sandwich
I'm thinking a little DNS trickery to make his domain redirect to ffrf.org wouldn't be over the line.
http://www.reddit.com/r/Music/comments/8on58/dear_reddit_we_need_a_guitar_tab_equivilent_to/  Some dude asked for this... I think this is the closest to a Guitar Tab equivalent. Still has some bugs but I'm sure those can be ironed out.
In case anyone thinks adrianmonk is psychotic, note that it's really just German for:   The, Flash. The. THE THE **THE THE \*T\*H\*E\***. Oh, also, please remember to   TTTTT H   H EEEEE    T   H   H E    T   HHHHH EEE    T   H   H E    T   H   H EEEEE  P.S. reddit markdown is weird.
In some languages, such as Greek and Hebrew, the shape of a letter changes if it comes at the end of the word.  Greek has a special shape for an sigma at the end of a word, and Hebrew for an m.  In archaic English, my guess is that f was the normal form and s was a final form.  Also note that German has a character called [ess-tsett](http://knowledgerush.com/kr/encyclopedia/Ess-tsett/) (literally, "s" "z") that functions as a double s.  It looks a lot like the archaic fs formation.
Just saying it's a conspiracy theory doesn't make it so. There is sound science behind it. Even the conservative estimates are at 2030, which is easily in my lifetime. These are from respected people.
WTF!!
Sure you can.  I just voted on [this post](http://www.reddit.com/r/modtalk/comments/7qjlg/notes_for_a_new_moderator/).
&gt; its worth it to borrow a decent car. THIS--dear lord, this. I failed the test three times with a shitty old pickup truck with no power steering and more problems than the US economy (I would swear it was also, despite being tiny, about 20% longer than the parallel parking spot.) I switched to the new car, and everything went much better.
If they are lying about the cost of a loan you should take it up with the FSA as well, it would be a breach of the consumer credit act.
Let's stab our eye with an uncapped highlighter instead. 
Yeah you can hear it. You just have to listen closely and deeply. I think their arrangements are beautiful.
Masturbation?  
i pleasured myself to you.  thank you.
I disagree.
Dude this post is from 6 months ago, I didn't even recognize it.
I find it bad comedy that someone is willing to murder in the name of being pro-choice/pro-life.  Hypocrites much?  And this is supposed to convince the "nonbelievers" of that faith that they are peaceful, loving, kind, and caring?  What a joke...
What's the difference between a dead, rotting baby and Porsche?  I don't have a Porsche in my garage.
just do not get any games for any phone ever, its just not worth it
Drums are _so_ much easier to figure out than guitar.  I can't say I've ever run into an occurrence where I needed drum tabs. Plenty of times where I've been unable to grok something without bass/guitar tabs.  -signed guy with 2 degrees in music, primaries percussion and electric bass
I have often suggested this to people: do one major that will get you a job that you will like/tolerate, and do another major in some subject that you really love and want to learn more about
WTF is a "nuclear umbrella"?  Does that mean that we think that fighters can intercept a short-range missile lobbed from NK to SK?  Or does it mean that we will drop a nuclear weapon on NK if they do some unspecified bad thing?  And, isn't the main threat a massive ground attack from the North? How much help are a few fighter planes going to be in that event?  Unfortunately, the South, being a modern industrialized urban society, is going to be much more vulnerable than the more primitive, rural North. The South has far more to lose, even if they ultimately win.
Which episode is that?
Hova don't pay for strange!
[Gods don't kill people.  People with gods kill people](http://www.cafepress.com/bsalert/1940659)
Well, he left, so I guess the problem is solved.  I hope he didn't feel rejected or anything, he was pretty cute.  I just can't deal with the idea that I might have to interact with the opposite sex right now.   Last relationship really got my defenses down and self-esteem low; I just need time and space to heal.  Argh, see all the negativity draining out of me even as I type to a complete stranger on the Internet?   This is exactly why I cannot deal with anything having to do with attraction and everything that follows!
[I was bored](http://megaswf.com/view/8a52d03ec86fddf093935a9262c6d726.html)  //Edit: [added sound plus some cheap effects](http://megaswf.com/view/2270d3ba5facbd07bca6630351d85163.html). Too lazy to try anything better right now.
All of those are great movies. Sure, one of these things is not like the other, but...Who doesn't love Batman?
Poor Smokey
Now your grammar is failing. Alcohol or sleep deprevation?
yeah, i cant stand uma thurman
looks awfully old for 37 
&gt; The clinic itself is unusual in that it offers funerary services to its patients. Some of these services include photographs, footprinting and handprinting, baptism, cremation, arrangement for burial in or out of state, and arrangement for amniocentesis and/or autopsy.   http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/George_Tiller
Thank you for your reasoned response.  The reason I posted this is because I feel that we do use the word terrorist too much and it has indeed become a synonym for "person that committed a crime and who I disagree with."   But it would still seem that until we know the motivation of the killer we cannot label him a terrorist.  If a pro-life group claims responsibility or he was part of a violent group, then I will be more inclined to call it terrorism.  But if he is just an isolated crazy fucker that decided to kill a well known figure that he disagreed with, I would not call him a terrorist. So until we do know, don't you think we should reserve judgment?  
Possibly, or the site may never get updated again because the admin is about to go to prison for murder.
I would lump all athiests into the inconsiderate asshole group...   Cept I know not to judge -all- people of a group on the actions of a very vocal few. 
[It's not that tough](http://search.live.com/results.aspx?q=sharepoint+hello+world).  Like I said, I'm not a "programmer", but I've made production code changes in SP.
You jackass.
Match, set, game!
Your childish attitude says everything.  Good luck with your petty vendetta.
reddit search is the brokendest thing on the interwebs.
Let's keep assembling the cast: http://www.partydomain.co.uk/d-commerce/media/main/W/WB-R50111.jpg
please tell me someone in vancouver has something awesome planned, you guys can be pretty funny up there
I don't have dinner with faggots, feminists, or muslims.   So yes, I'm usually pretty delightful at dinner because I eat with people that I get along with and respect.
This man is wise, you would be wise to follow his advice.
There is one fundamental rule of driving - only one thing on your car can ***ever***, under ***any circumstances*** touch anything else, and that is the tires to the road. So long as ***nothing*** on your car ***ever*** touches anything else but the tires to the road, you will be just fine.   YOU are responsible for knowing the position and speed of every object within your action horizon. If it is in any way possible for something to intersect or interact with you, ***you must know where it is, where it's going, and be absolutely prepared for any changes it may make***.   Your trajectory must NEVER cross the trajectory of another vehicle within a several second time window. This means no tailgaiting, don't allow yourself to be tailgated, and you must plan and prepare for any cross traffic that may occur.   Learn to drive a stick so you can really feel your car. You don't always have to drive one, but someone who doesn't know how to drive a stick doesn't really know how to drive a car. It's like someone who needs a calculator to do basic math.   Feel your throttle with your right foot (and flywheel with your left, if you have a clutch). Feel your brakes (***BRAKES, people, dammit, not breaks!***) with your right foot. You NEVER, EVER, EVER work the BRAKE with your left foot.   If you turn your wipers on, you MUST turn your headlights on, I don't know why that isn't automatic. When it's foggy, turn on your lights. If you've got a car that's color is similar to the road or the sky, turn them earlier than you would otherwise so people can see you.   ALWAYS indicate if you're going to do something which another drive may need to account for.   If you're turning, USE THE TURN LANE. Don't decelerate until you're IN the turn lane. You don't have to come to a complete stop to turn, you don't have to go 5mph to turn, don't drive like an old Asian lady.   When making a left turn, if you have a green but not an arrow, *occupy the intersection* so that you are guaranteed to turn when the light turns yellow. This also allows other people to enter the intersection behind you so they can turn also. When I say 'occupy', I mean pull into the intersection so that your turn will be a right angle instead of a smooth curve, but don't interfere with the oncoming lane.  Onramps are for coming up to speed. GET UP TO SPEED WHILE YOU ARE ON THE ONRAMP! Don't wait to get on the highway to get to the speed limit.   Similarly, offramps are for deceleration. DO NOT DECELERATE WHILE ON THE HIGHWAY! In fact, I'm going to say this - except in terms of life or death, when driving on the highways, *never* use your brakes unless you have to. If you use your brakes on the highway, it means ***you made a mistake and got too close to someone else***. Don't do that. Mistakes are dangerous.  Plan your driving, understand your route in a dynamic sense. Don't just get in your car and stare five feet in front of your hood. Look around you at all times, know where everyone else is. If you're going a different speed than them, plot your course through them ahead of time. Create a game plan, don't figure it out play-by-play.   Speaking of that, the speed limit is whatever the conditions are safe for. A highway that's safe for 85 on a sunny day may not be safe for 55 in the heavy rain or even 35 in the snow.   Do not EVER impede someone else's progress. Don't intersect with their trajectories, and DO NOT cause them to apply their brakes or alter their course. NEVER pull in front of someone if it will cause them to have to slow down. If you're going slower than someone, get behind them and leave them alone. If you're going faster, get ahead of them ASAP. If someone comes up behind you going faster than you on the highway, move to the right and STAY THERE! Never force someone to pass you on the right.   If you ever find yourself driving side by side with another person, all of ethics and morality compels you to SPEED UP AND PASS THEM, then MOVE OVER.  If you EVER find ANYONE in your rearview mirror, GET OUT OF THEIR WAY.   Flashing your headlights at oncoming cars means "cop ahead!" whereas flashing your lights at the car in front of you means "Get out of my way!"   If you're on the highway in stop-and-go traffic where it creeps then everyone speeds up then it creeps again, maintain the average speed of motion at all times, allowing distance between you and the next car to grow when they speed up and shrink when it slows down. Don't ever use your brakes, you may just be idling along. But once you've exited the jam, not only are you out of it, but if you've done this properly, you ENDED the traffic jam for everyone! (This is true.)  I guess this is more of a master's class from a connoisseur of driving.   Remember, driving is one of the funnest video games you'll ever play, but you've only got one life on this one, and if you fuck it up, well... game over.
I use carpet cleaner on tough stains on my clothes. Works every time. 
And they still haven't caught me. Good luck.
JSF
it does, but I don't think it's that factor. no one likes having their self-held truths questioned, and one of the first things I learned in Introductory Philosophy is that the practice can be potentially dangerous. people- albeit, irrational ones- will kill, assault, and threaten to keep their beliefs from being questioned. that is why people of faith tend to reject non-theological philosophy, and it's education. and on that note, it came to mind that maybe I was never taught this stuff in high school or middle school because there are interested parties out there who would like to keep me from asking the dangerous questions. not always religious parties, but powerful ones who would like to control the overtly emotional side of humanity and myself.
I upmodded you because it is merely obvious what you are stating.  First of all, if you are pro-abortion, you are fucking sick.  If you are pro-letting-society-kill-babies-without-lying-about-it-for-the-greater-good then you are in my camp, welcome.  If you are for-letting-people-kill-babies-but-only-if-they-sugar-coat-it, I will smack you across the face with my cock so hard you will be eating out of a straw for a month.  That is what I hate, two 'camps' of idiots, both using propaganda and hate, and worse, a sea of ignorance separating the two, arguing over which bunch of cocksuckers are right or wrong, instead of forming their own sane opinion.  Clue-train: they are both wrong.
It's much better to do something than nothing. My suggestion: close your laptop right now and go over and say, "hey, I love reddit. Did you see x article?" The longer you wait, the harder it will get.
Yep
You were right in assuming it was a stupid idea.  The only exception I can see would be if you were a moderator in a large and successful subreddit.
Good point.
That is most certainly NOT what this article is about. At issue, according to Bob Herbert, is that this country has ignored its state institutions to the point that they have crumbled. The conclusion of the article is the exact opposite of yours:  *"If the U.S. is to have any hope of getting its economic act together over the next few years, there will have to be a much greater focus on putting people back to work. Rebuilding the infrastructure is the place to start."*
a little bit, but more of the first one.
Companion
Maybe she's just focused on what she's doing.
Now we just need a casualty for JPEGs with text.
A step up from Mr. and Mrs. [Hacksaw](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jim_Duggan), I guess.
Too true. I can't recall a single scene that started with a hug...  Does that mean I can start my own genre? Sentimental Fucking.
Have you not heard of the samsquantch?
I was this &gt;--&lt; close to posting here and saying "Dammit wacrover I know you're lurking!" to try and freak you out again.   Glad you're back :)  I went five days, but I still pm'd back and forth with some of my friends.  Did you do the same?
Eh, he should have just politely asked the mother and her daughter to leave. She didn't belong there, just as his sons didn't belong in the women's locker room. 
Didn't know about that sub. thanks.
Woah there mister assumption man.  First off we don't know the capacity of the human brain.  Sure we know that we can remember groups of seven very easily or that we know a few thousands words in vocabulary but we can't say our brains are X powerful.  Secondly, intelligence is a tricky definition and does not have one clear answer.  I do agree however that circuits will be as widely available as candy.
depends on what your idea of "cosmic" order is  something is only "ordered" if you *give* that  significance to it.  lets say we have an abbreviated deck of cards that is arranged 2,3,4,5,6,7,8,9,10,J,Q,K,A ... then we shuffle them a few times and they are now arranged  K,2,5,9,3,A,7,8,J,4,Q,6,10... then there is no perceivable order.  But what if we turned those cards on their faces and discovered that the letters A,B,C,D,E,F,G,H,I,J,K,L,M,N were painted on the backs of those cards... in that order.  Assume the act of shuffling was *completely random*, not simply perceived randomness, as we humans are limited to generating. But instead, the way the cards were mixed were governed by no algorithms at all.  You could *call* those cards ordered, but are they *really*?  In the same sense, intelligence doesn't *need* to arise from order. In fact it's quite the opposite-- intelligence is simply the prerequisite by which you label something ordered. The cards are only "ordered" after the fact.
&gt; It's not a keyword; it's a method. That's mighty odd given:  &gt;&gt; foo = proc { 1 }   =&gt; #&lt;Proc:0x0038ac20@(irb):2&gt;   &gt;&gt; methods.include? "proc"   =&gt; false &gt; Because one block is used more frequently. That's putting the buggy before the horse. In Smalltalk passing two blocks is very common:  self x &gt; y  ifTrue:  [ ... ]   ifFalse: [ ... ] Factor has something like this too. Here's if:  [ ... ] [ ... ] if or case:  { { 1 [ "a" ] }   { 2 [ "b" ] }   { 3 [ "c" ] } } case You can easily make a lot of interesting control structures this way, without needing a macro system. Ruby has hamstrung itself by making more that one block distinctly ceremonial.
Is it inconsiderate to point out that believing in gods and monsters is superstition?
Oh my god I am **SO BORED**
So the murderer is clearly not pro-life. But just because there are people who claim to be pro-life and aren't doesn't make all pro-life people non-pro life. You are free to call it something else -- but you are not going to make any friends on the other side that way.
Sit down grandpa. Let the kids play on your lawn.
I've always speculated that was the source of this [quote](http://www.nydailynews.com/news/politics/2009/03/02/2009-03-02_john_mccains_daughter_meghan_having_trou.html) from Meghan McCain after the election:  &gt;[An admirer] "asked me if I ever *wore pearls* because they probably would look as good on me as they do on my mother," she wrote.   I don't think she caught onto it, but, for a creepy guy hitting on her, my guess is he was asking about a pearl necklace.
This wasn't a hidden episode or anything, I remember seeing this tons of times as a kid.
"Never trust the user."
You also stated that if he did end up being motivated by pro-choice ideals, you would be the first to jump up and say terrorist.  "They are using violence to achieve social change, not political change, and while this definition may constitute torture for the FBI, it would not constitute torture to more discriminating governments."  Using violence to achieve social change is terrorism, in my book. I'm not the government, I do not use this word lightly, please stop comparing me to them. In fact, it's the first time I've used the word on Reddit PERIOD.  A larger conspiracy isn't needed in this case, because it IS NOT AN ISOLATED CASE. This is not the first doctor killed in the idea of "the sanctity of life", only the most recent.
Well, I really like muffins. So much so, that I would just div...  um...who am I kidding...
No, I think that "Pro-choice" is the correct term.  I am not pro-abortion. I am "pro" not having someone else's religious beliefs thrust upon me, "pro" being able to decide what is best for me and "pro" having the choice to have an abortion if I deem it necessary.  I don't want to have to make that choice, but I really do not want someone else making the choice for me.  Why should someone else's religious beliefs choose what I can do? That doesn't make sense.  Pro-choice is the correct term. 
It's good practice to read someone's name before replying. 
Not so much.  The Wall is kinda played out.
My sex drive actually increased, and my load increased by a strangely significant amount, but that might have been the result of the chemo I was on, I don't really know. I don't know if this would have continued after the chemo, however, because something else happened.  About six months later I had a retroperitoneal lymph node dissection.  As a result of this surgery, I developed a condition known as retrograde ejaculation. So now I don't ejaculate at all, but I still orgasm. What would normally be ejaculated instead enters my bladder and exits the next time I urinate (which is a little gross, I know, but you asked). If I decide to have children one day they can still use my sperm for insemination.   The lack of clean-up or of worrying about accidental pregnancy with a sexual partner is nice, but it still kinda sucks explaining it. At first I was unhappy about it (much moreso than the losing a testicle thing, actually, because I got a fake ball during that operation and my junk looks basically the same). I'm pretty much over it now, though.
Backspace without focus on the textbox takes you back one page, which would delete what he had written.
What about the shiticane?  I like that one better.
Bring up some porn and kind of move your screen so she can see what you're looking at.  Guys sitting alone watching porn turns chicks on.  Didn't you ever see the movie Taxi Driver?
These snozzberries taste like cucumbers?!
&gt; Doesn't seem like it would hurt anything but bring more attention to Tiller  That is just chilling...
The blood... oh god the blood. Everywhere, blood...
The best way to turn someone down is to do it firmly and unambiguously. If you want to be "nice" by looking back at him, he'll just get more upset. If that doesn't work, can you go somewhere where he's not facing you?
"But she never tired of telling her story."  "Oh not at all. I like it, because everyone makes such a fuss of me! And I have travelled to so many places because of it, meeting all the people. Oh I wouldn't get tired of it. I'm not the type." 
Good cobb pipes are 4 dollars for the consumer.   15 bucks for a poorly engineered pipe? really?!  There is more to a good pipe than just 2 holes and a bend.
Any organization affiliated with the murderer should be treated as a terrorist organization, as this action is meant to terrorise doctors and other law abiding persons. That it is not a Muslim organizatio0n should not matter. The organizers should share the guilt, and punishment, of the murder.
I saw it many many times. So, no it wasn't.
So... he tried to do it wrong and accidentally got it right in a few places.  Edit: I don't actually care.
ooOoh, and what else?
Do you have any idea how many hours of maintenance an F-15 needs per hour of flight time? Last I heard it was upwards of ten hours. So with a ground crew working non-stop, an F-15 can only fly 10% of the time. F-22 maintenance times are significantly lower because of the newness of the weapons platform, and the computer-assisted maintenance (they literally have a laptop they plug into a Raptor that lists the repairs needed to get it flightworthy or to 100%, and in order of importance) 
[Tom Cruise](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tom_Cruise#Scientology)
&gt; Dude, It's not your body. Do what you want with your body and your mind, let women decide what to do with theirs.  The point Godsnutz are trying to make is that at a certain point, it isn't just the female's body but also the baby's. The question is, at what point in its development does the child acquire the same rights as everybody else? 
From a Rheostatics song.
I cannot upvote you enough, sir.  This child's parents were trying to protect her from her own bad decisions (Duh, 13 year olds shouldn't be having babies.)  OH Noes!  Post-abortion, she became promiscuous, tried drugs, had PTSD, and an eating disorder?  Please.  I'm not sure who I'm more disgusted with...O'Reilly or his guest.
 return problems.contains(bitch);
&gt; awesome [...] asshole  Well, which is it? 
A fetus can't really suffocate as it is not breathing to begin with. The hypertonic saline in the amniotic sac causes a fluid shift leading to dehydration of the fetus.  Depending on scientific dogma and your religious beliefs, you either believe the fetus is a life and you should not be having the abortion, or you believe it to be a collection of cells that are not alive in a true sense. An abortion doctor and the person choosing an abortion should belong to the latter group, otherwise they cannot do it without violating their own moral system.  Once you believe it to be a collection of cells, what is the difference if it is in the toilet or not? If she found that offensive, did she voice her concern, and did then they refuse to accomodate her? Did she ask to take the fetus for burial and they refused? I suspect the answer is no, and she does not mention it as it does not make for a good O'Reilly Factor segment.  She makes her out to be a victim here, but nobody of any age can be forced to have an abortion. If she feels she was coerced, the blame lies with the parents, not Dr. Tiller.
already saw this and it was so cute (but the subtitles were so bad). looking forward to seeing this on the big screen!
You have to understand. If they can just keep you and others from espousing your ideas then they don't have to question their faith or wonder why there is such a large movement to put faith based belief systems in their proper place, the mind of the believer.  Its the ostrich/head in the sand thing but they want it to be your head. 
The Judicial Council of California's Administrative Office of the Courts is currently running a project, originally budgeted at $250 million but likely to cost more than twice as much, to develop a case-management system for its courts.  This is a system that almost none of the courts (except the two that it was built for) wants.  It's being built using fantastically expensive methodologies that have a low probability of success, making it one of a long line of dismal state-run IT projects.  Nobody is even contemplating touching *that* money.
[Enjoy!](http://www.surfthechannel.com/show/514.html)  Some season one episodes missing, but 2nd and 3rd are really good for getting started.   *You got to blame thing up here*
you sir, underestimated the only worthwhile work of Shakespeare ;)  (and by that I mean, the one where _everybody_ dies)
Really? While the heat capacity of anything you put in your freezer will be greater than air, the converse is also true. Air has very low heat capacity, so heating it up doesnt take much energy. While a full freezer will stay frozen longer, I don't think that translates energy efficiency.
shh! The extremists don't want to hear anything reasonable!  They would rather picket Planned Parenthood offices - ones which are more or less restricted to handing out rubbers anyway - with signs of  what are in reality pig fetuses emblazoned with "MURDER" below the image.  *edit: Not calling LordVoldemort an extremest here, just fyi*
Not only collaborate, invite their friends that invite their friends until you own the restaurant!
Thanks i was already feeling pretty insignificant..
Aww hellz yes
Thought you might enjoy [this](http://imgur.com/ac0xB.jpg), then.
Well, one of them has a bitch called "USA".
No shame in trying.  If at first you don't succeed, try try again.
Then you have mojo the helper monkey.
Say hello.
Wake up and smell the music, guys!
This is precisely why I'm in favor of the Illuminati being in charge.
Any organization affiliated with the murderer should be treated as a terrorist organization, as this action is meant to terrorise doctors and other law abiding persons. That it is not a Muslim organization should not matter. The organizers should share the guilt, and punishment, of the murder.
Anyone else just happy that there's something out there called the "Majestic Sombrero Galaxy"?  If I ever own a restaurant, and we serve any Mexican food whatsoever, it will be called The Majestic Sombrero.
Does he look like a BITCH?
To me, that really should be the be all end all of everything in terms of any sort of relationship with a company. Unless there is in fact state and federal laws (not civil) being broken while on the job and/or after and there is a complaint filed with sufficient to arrest the guy, civil lawsuits like that should not be allowed for someone simply quitting their job. 
Hello Geekistan, we have some money for you.
looks good but it uses chords not tabs...
YOU'RE A KITTY!
You tryin' to start something?
I wish this was a billboard, if I were rich I would straight up pay to have this up
What's the point of posting the non-English ads without translations? I can't read Polish.
No problemo.  It is actually pretty new and, it would be rather arrogant for anyone to act like you SHOULD have known it existed.  Here is a question for you:  As you've been in the states for over a decade, I assume you've been able to do so some traveling in that time. What is your favorite place in the USA that you've been?
it was lupus once...
I can't access the post? It says "Forbidden."
The Stupids...
Kidney stones...
She claims mental stress and self-destructive behavior after the incident- I'm fairly certain that anyone with the personality to get pregnant at 13 is destined for these problems anyway.
Dumb person.  Who the fuck are you to draw arbitrary lines to decide who has an onus to stand up and criticize this in a self-mitigating way?  Perhaps the guy had a beard, and you think bearded people should stand up and denounce his actions?  He shot someone on the grounds of abortion, does that mean all people who are against abortion have the onus to stand up and criticize his actions?  You are fucken stupids.
Heh, was hoping I'd see that one on the site.  I'm from Davenport, and when this happened all I remember thinking was "wtf was that guy thinking?"  Also just for the record, Edgerton provides STD testing, pregnancy testing, and a variety of other health services. As far as I know, they don't do abortions at all.  The more you know
Just going off of what I've paid for my other tattoos, and depending on the size, probably around $75-$100 CDN.
Vimperator is fairly well known on Reddit, but remarkably obscure elsewhere. (Responses are one of: "You want to get rid of the GUI? Wat?" and "You want Firefox to behave like Vim? Why aren't you using elinks?") I find it speeds up my browsing in Firefox significantly, though I generally use Opera.
I think it is a marketing issue.  Modern smokers buy glass pieces for the most part, and when you place a colorful, well shaped pipe next to a blocky wood pipe, I think the glass will win out.  Now if you could carve a wood pipe in a similar design as a glass pipe (and maybe even add some stain or colors - although the toxicity would have to be taken into account), then you might have something.
http://music.metafilter.com/2380/Punch-Em-In-The-Dick-NSFW-lyrics
I don't know who Stan Freburg is, but I imagine that's meant as a sort of comedy routine.  Funny enough, to be sure, but that sort of thing did actually happen in real life.  James Boswell, in his *Life of Johnson*, records a minor feud that developed between Samuel Johnson and a woman he knew because he had, in a letter, happily described her needlepoint embroidery as "subtle."  This being the mid-1700s spelling conventions were somewhat different, and the word was spelled "sutile," and, rendered with the character here being discussed, appeared in the letter as "futile."  She was not impressed with his judgement and it apparently took some time to convince her of what had actually been meant.
Those comments on the article are kind of ridiculous.  Blame it all on those "Dems"
creeper. Wait, unless your good looking? If not, creeper.
Uh oh, looks like someone is about to have his affair with a prostitute publicized. 
What do you use to get a dead baby in a bowl? A blender. What do you use to get it out? Chips.
I Dated a Robot.  I had to Google the quote too.
Ya that is one weird looking beaver.
He seems to know a fair amount of interfacial interaction forces, commenting on the fluid's shape in the can at rest.  I would guess that that's a fairly obvious solution for great number of materials engineers--especially those concerned with surface energy and similar phenomena.  I used to use a similar technique to pick up small chips cut from a silicon wafer (it was actually a carbon film on a silicon wafer) on a smooth surface where you can't get tweezers underneath the chip, so you hold another chip and put down a drop of water and pick up the one on the table.
He was killed because to pro life people he is a mass murderer.   Also, you're a fucking idiot.
I did 2 degrees because I just wanted to learn more and more. You should probably declare the other major NOW before finishing, you have more of a chance of the university allowing you to complete it than you do of the university letting you back in after you finish the first.
[Ask and ye shall receive.](http://www.jaunted.com/story/2007/5/7/163645/5550/travel/Emirates+Airlines+First+Class+Cabin+Video+Tour)
Yes, and every word is true!  This is the biggest lie that the world has ever told.
Don't worry, its not Hank Paulson saying it, so there is no need to worry.
If I hate all terrorists, and one terrorist happens to be Semite, does that make me anti-Semite by your fucked-up logic!? I suppose I must be anti-gun too, since I don't like school shooters. And I guess if I didn't vote for Obama, I must be a KKK member then. Your smearing guilt-by-association BS doesn't play well with thinking people, Herkimer.  Come on, all of us in the military know that Al Qaeda was not the reason for 9/11. It was a political ploy, blood for oil, and for power in the middle east.  My opinion? You should go back to playing the indignant rage card, it works much better than the race card, Herkimer.
Is God willing to prevent evil, but not able? Then he is not omnipotent.   Is he able, but not willing? Then he is malevolent.   Is he both able and willing? Then whence cometh evil?   Is he neither able nor willing? Then why call him God?  - Epicurus
&gt;You need an incentive to be good. Rational stuff like Kantian ethics just won't cut it: reasoning doesn't equal incentive. You need to find a reason why is it in your OWN interest to be good. Otherwise nobody will give a fuck.  You try fitting that into a tagline on a bus ad.
Er, you are aware that in the USA, and pretty much everywhere else where abortion is legal, late term abortions are limited to instances where the life or health of the mother is in danger, or when the fetus is basically dead, right?  No one is out there getting third trimester for grins and giggles, or because they just suddenly decided they didn't want a baby after all.  All of Dr. Tiller's third trimester patients were women who wanted a child and discovered either that having the fetus would kill or maim them, or that the fetus was sufficiently malformed that it wouldn't live.  That last category accounted for the overwhelming majority of his third trimester abortions, in most, but not all, instances where carrying a healthy fetus to term would injure or kill the mother its possible to do a modified cesarian and avoid the need for an abortion.
easy one is holding a nuke the other one a body bomb heh
eh, nothing exciting for me.  My dad's car battery died at a gas station, so he pulled out a jumpercable to jump start it with the help of someone else, and i just liked the name jumpercable, so it stuck :)
Just put 2006 "Time Magazine Person of the Year" http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/You_%28Time_Person_of_the_Year%29
Where the bluebirds sing
email her a photo of your penis. It actually worked for me once.
That's a mouth breather if I've ever seen one.
check youtube.   (seriously, my answer is about as vague as your description. Were they color? CG? describe some!) 
kilmer is too scary, im not trying to kilmer anyone
Back when I was a teenager, I first got on the internets using this thing called [Hotline](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hotline_Communications) on the Mac. It was soo cooooool. Everyone on there was like a totally l33t haxx0r and had cool nicks like AwesomeDangerousGuy and RazorBurn and DeadlyNinjaMofo.  So I, of course, had to be a contrarian and pick the exact opposite of a mean dangerous sounding name: [munificent](http://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/munificent). Stuck with it like 15 years.  Now, more than anything, it serves as a reminder to myself to try to be decent when posting on here and other sites. It's so easy to be an asshole in text. My name helps me aspire to something better.
I heard it as,  What's the worst part about killing a baby?  Getting blood on your clown suit.
And I'm sure you bring sunshine and laughter wherever you go too. 
I wonder what they kept in the strongbox.  Probably bandages.
My Intel Etherexpress Pro/1000 NIC works fine under Ubuntu 9.04.  WTF are you talking about?
Totally underrated movie.
Most men have no idea what their testosterone level.
&gt;I'll complete your little anecdote. Government raises taxes on the rich. The rich increase lobbying efforts increasing spending. Recession happens. Instead of getting rid of the increased spending due to lobbying they get rid of welfare.  That's not the story at all. It's closer to:  Voters lower taxes for everyone.  Government runs out of money.  Government raises income taxes on the rich.  Stock market tanks, rich people lose 90% of their income (leaving them still very rich).  Income tax drops 90%.  Feces meets fan.  We could argue all day about whose fault it is, but the problem will still be that we're too reliant on a very volatile income source.
How many is too many?  Just curious.  If you know what I mean.
&gt;"Every time" is a bit absolutist  In fact it is absolutely absolute.
Did you interview them in-character? I heard they always do public appearances in-character.
twss
&gt; "Peggy, we're shopping for a super bowl party, not your feminine products. *Diet Coke...*"
I can't stand Fairuza Balk.   http://www.imdb.com/name/nm0000103/mediaindex  She just so fucking hideous to me, with that big ugly psycho clown mouth. Her voice and laughter are so annoying too. I really don't wanna see any movie she comes out in just so I don't have to put up with her.
In my last job, I did exactly that (I worked for a web development firm). I did my work, I went home. When I was asked to stay a bit extra on a project, I might. But usually when it was done as trying to obviously get a little extra out of me on a more regular basis, I would decline and they had to take it. Unless I was taking days and days of unpaid time off, really it is too expensive for an ethical and business smart business to fire a highly experienced and trained individual with a certain salary level for not working a few extra hours for free every night. 
Welcome to the intertubes.   Please keep your arms inside your tube at all times, and enjoy your ride.   Please refrain from feeding the trolls.   Please remain seated until ride has come to a complete stop.
Sorry.  Try [this one](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/7qjws/notes_for_a_new_moderator/).
Except a small prick of light in the sky wouldn't cast enough light to see with.
A link from Live.com? Between that and liking Sharepoint proves to me that you actually work for Microsoft.
Rednecks keep eating all the grass.
I think your first point is accurate. I think your second is not. It is a fear tactic and it is murder, it's not like it can't be both.
Fuck that. Here is my list of why you shouldn't-  1) User Privacy - if you're including javascript from google on every page you're making it very easy for google to track who visits your site. A few years ago people were going nuts over DoubleClick building marketing profiles using information collected from their included ads, yet people are giving DoubleClick's new owner the same power.  2) Your privacy- for most of the same reasons above, you're giving google an amazing amount of power over your own information. Whats to stop them from incorporating your traffic patterns into their search engine results? That might benefit bigger sites, but will it hurt smaller sites?  3) Performance- seriously, who hasn't had to wait for a page to load after it got hung up waiting on a google ad or analytic script? Its not constant, but it happens often enough for me that I think its ridiculous to assume switching to google's CDN will benefit performance enough to counteract the problems. Google's CDN may be massive, but so is its traffic.  Overall, I just think its stupid to rely on a giant corporation to give you this service without there being something in it for them. It may just be that they really are trying to help the internet and all that, but there is going to be temptation to use the data they're able to mine from it and for that reason alone I'll host my own javascript files.
I will bet you any amount between $1 and $1,000,000 that the masses will flock to this.  You are one of those people that should look up, it's all over your head.
"I Dated a Robot" (Season 3, Episode 15)
Awesome jeans...whats wrong with it?
English has the word "fracas" meaning "fight" or "brawl".  Also "fractious", meaning "looking for trouble" or "unruly".
interesting read.. I'm not all up to speed on the zionism\Israel\Palestine\US-involvement politics, but I just have one question: I looked up AIPAC, and it stands for American Israel Public Affairs Committee. why does a country need a lobbying group? is there something I'm missing here? isn't that what diplomats and foreign dignitaries\emissaries are for? to go to the other countries to engage in international relations to benefit both parties?
Still an exiled tudent.  Still budding MacGeek.  And baby, he's an out and out smartass.
I really can't afford MobileMe right now, but I depend on it for push email, with my iPhone. Does anyone know of any free solution to the problem? I don't care about data storage, or over the air syncing of bookmarks, contacts and calendars. Really all I care about is the email.   Anything?
EDIT: i'm a dumbass, see thibit below......  D'oh!
the morning after pill isn't an abortifacent, if you are speaking of plan b.  RU-486 is an abortifacent which is not the same as plan b. Please get your facts straight.
Trust me.  All furs are ashamed of him.
Truly Futurama is the Holy Writ.
This is just what I needed to hear.  Thank you.
not suspicious, here are more photos from different angles etc...  http://www.campaignbrief.com/asia/2009/02/seennoted-natural-paint-colour.html
Bestiality? Santa Claus is against traditional marriage! We need a constitutional amendment forbidding Christmas
leo di caprio, after titanic i couldn't stand the sight of him, i liked the departed and was willing to give him a second chance and then he did body of lies, awful movie
Pretty much anybody can call themselves scientists. I think it's better to say they've pretended to be _doctors_ since the 19th century.  Uh, now I will get the libel courts after me...
very nice.  but so is [No Freckles](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/8oqcz/no_freckles_pic/).
Hulu on the Xbox 360.
wat
Pretty sloppy playing, and not a difficult song in this style.
It is the Malthusian Cause, of that there can be no doubt. The more Human population, the more damage to the environment. If you cannot make that connection, there is not much hope for you!
I’d like to start new discussion this week with this challenging topic. In my post about “Top Five Disappointing PLM Technologies” last week, I mentioned PLM/PDM -ERP integration as #2 and actually got lots of interesting comments on this. And as I mentioned, this topic, in my opinion, has remained the same for at least the last 5-10 years. So, I came to the conclusion that there is something fundamentally wrong and it will be really good to make open up a more detailed discussion on this.
I love when people are being ironic in the same breath as them pointing out irony. 
I'm uncreative.
You know, Kemo Sabe is actually Navajo for "soggy shrub".  It doesn't actually mean "faithful friend" in any language. 
I think Bastiat said it with a bit more style...  "Government is the great fiction, through which everybody endeavors to live at the expense of everybody else."
The best proxy for the risk of a medical profession is the cost of malpractice insurance. It is much lower for chiropractors than MDs. So, I conclude the risk also is lower.
Cyberspace != Space
nice boat
I could come up with about 20 counterarguments and workarounds if I wanted to put the effort into it...
No mention of him being a terrorist, even though he clearly used violence to advance his political agenda. Guess you are only a terrorist if you kill people and you are an Arab or a converted black muslim. F***kin media. 
Yes, tell them especially about the many reasons there are under the sun to hate the jews.  Liberal professors at colleges love that stuff as much as reddit.
Article says 'vanguard of the 3,000 Secret Service officers backed by CIA and FBI personnel who will secure the US president during his stay in Egypt'.  You can read it either way. It's either that the vanguard of the Secret Service will be protecting him or this is the first portion of the Secret Service that will be showing.
I thought this was going to be about an Indycar Racing game and I got all confused.
What's pink and silver, crawls around on all fours and scratches up the walls ?  A baby with forks in it's eyes.
Is r/Atheism mostly trolls or what?
Seems to be a split hair.  He was pro-life, he may also have been a terrorist, and he certainly was murderer.  To refuse to call him pro-life is to refuse to acknowledge that there are those that call themselves by that label that see no problem with murder of abortion doctors.  I do not doubt that the vast majority of pro-life folks find the act of murder repugnant, but that doesn't mean that you can't have morons who can't comprehend the dichotomy of using murder to protest abortion.
What's worse than a barrel full of dead babies?  One eating it's way out.
On your first point we completely agree. There is a significant difference between a viewpoint and a law in society. But in a democracy it is critically important to consider and understand various viewpoints as it is simply the acceptance of a particular viewpoint that defines law.  We seem to not want to believe this, we want to believe we can get past this through science, but a democracy is all about shoving the beliefs of the majority down the throats of the minority. It ain't pretty, but what's the alternative?  How do you come to accept a particular viewpoint? That is completely up to you. Frankly, I believe science is utterly silent on when personhood begins. Please correct me if I'm wrong.  That being the case, I think pragmatic people have to look at the world around them, see what science can factually define, and take their best "guess" (although I realize that is probably not the right word).
Nothing important.
I was using anecdotal evidence. I know many people who are bipolar and several dozen who have schizophrenia (volunteered at a soup kitchen for a number of years, and as we all know, Reagan got rid of institutions for the mentally ill, so there are many mentally ill who are homeless).  Everyone I knew who came back after having a break would say something about not taking their meds. I conflated the understanding of what happens when they do not take their medication with knowing that they had a severe mental disorder.
Oh, that's a lot more logical. Faggot.
Right, there are examples of elective surgery.  I'm just suggesting that maybe "the right to one's own body" isn't enough to justify **any** medical procedure, even ones with little risk.
Don't listen to them man, you gotta be you. You get that tattoo.
I'm going camping for my for my first time in years.  I don't want to spend much, but I need a tent (for two).  I'll be lucky if I use it yearly.   I"m thinking this looks good: http://www.amazon.com/Eureka-Tetragon-Adventure-7-Foot-Two-Person/dp/B000EQAUVY/  Suggestions?
Marvin.   *Marvin*   **Marvin!**  I'd knock that shit off if I was you.
What the fuck kind of piece of shit hardware do you have?  NO OS has a problem with USB mice nowadays.
I want a new goddamn simulation game. That is all.
Haha, I was thinking of that too.  ##[Edit](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/8oqhv/im_seriously_considering_putting_time_person_of/)
upvoted for this argument
It never wrote one. 
all at the same quality of 1980 apple II game
Or *maybe* she's really a guy. (eyeroll)
Upvoted, relevant to my interests. I'm 21yo, 6'1", and 175lbs (male). Normally my weight is ideal for my size, but my build is slender, and I have excess fat around my tummy. I just want to get rid of my fat, I don't really care about muscles or weight.  I've always wondered, what foods are to be avoided? I can eat meat and protein stuff right?
Looks good, I'll have to check it out.
&gt;Religions aren't like sports teams.  Really? You root for a certain "team" based entirely on where you happened to be born and your upbringing, every sunday you watch games, you sometimes display your team colors and show your team support (by praying). And apparently you wish for the deaths of members of the other team.  I guess the only difference is that in this sport, everyone loses.
The logic is inescapable.
Kim: "This is incredibly hilarious. It's a shame that I'll have to see these two funny men killed, for the good of the state...."
One who is being from learning English of the second language.  End with the judgement!
What if one never killed a doctor yet argues (presents logic, like closing argument at court) that pregnancy termination is termination, while miscarriage is "abortion."  Termination-for-profit is termination-for-profit.  I was convinced by my environment that I was financially unable for fatherhood, at 23 years of age, so I clinically terminated my baby's life, a conflict of interest if I'm financially "shy" while others profit at my being convinced (of environment only) to be financially shy.  Meanwhile, a friend gave birth to two wonderful children at the age of 17 and 18, and at 36 she's free to date without hesitation.  In addition, the generation gap of liking the same music that your children like is a small or nonexistent gap, able to comprehend bullies at school and everything.  &gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;http://upperandlowercase.com
FCUK!!!!!!!!!!!!!
&gt;How did he get the bible that backwards? I mean, the bible is pretty odd and fucked up, but seriously, praising jesus and condoning murder and hate at the same time? Did he even read that "holy" book?  Actually, there's [more to it than you think...](http://www.evilbible.com/).  It's sad actually, but there literally are verses in the Bible telling followers of God to murder others.
The client actually caches them in case it can't contact the last.fm servers. So you shouldnt have lost any scrobbles :)
you are sick
I've noticed a correlation between climate change denial and an inability to master even basic English.  your - &gt; you're
**DRAGON QUEST IX**  That is all.
You were so close... Cars emit mostly CO2, some water, and very little CO. CO is a product of incomplete combustion (CO2 complete) and is a sign of an inefficient burn.  While there are plenty of causes of inefficiency in internal-combustion engines, failure to completely burn the fuel is not much of one.
What's black and blue and doesn't like sex?  The dead baby in my trunk!
I've recently discovered the joys of Fallout: 3.   I love playing stoned because I actually get scared.
I find it insensitive and inconsiderate. While I'm not highly religious, I respect the fact others are.   I wouldn't go up to an Athiest and scream at them God was real either. 
It's perfect.
It would be nice to find out:)
A friend of mine here was 38 years old and had a dead fetus in her.  The baby died in the second trimester.  She didn't want to carry the dead fetus for another 3 months and couldn't get it aborted here in Texas because of the laws about 3rd trimester abortions, so she went to Kansas to get it taken care of.  She had to deal with pro-lifers calling her names and ridiculing her and her husband each time they walked in and out of the hospital there.  Here's the part I have to share, which still pisses me off:  my friends have never voted for anyone but republicans.  They're good people but stupid when it comes to politics and their own hypocrisy.  They've always felt that "our nations safety and lower taxes are the reasons why I vote."  Ugh.  Anyway, there's more to the abortion argument than just confused teen mothers.  I wish more people knew this.
Doesn't NASA have a "Highway in the Sky Project"? I saw on TV not too long ago. It uses GPS and radio telemetry to make an artificial series of boxes in the sky that planes fly through when integrated with the autopilot. Looks promising. I have no idea if it's still being continued.
I think his intent was likely to kill one particular doctor.  
note to myself; its a bad thing to have babies.
*bursts from bathroom, vigorously firing hand-cannon at suited thugs*  **Die you mother fuckers!!!**   BANG BANG BANG BANG BANG BANG click click click click
The fine print: Poll done by Israelis on Palestinian prisoners illegally detained without trial or legal representation in secret prisons using the same torture techniques the Israelis taught the Americans to use at Gauntanamo and Abu Ghraib.
I got a letter from my ISP for downloading a game once. I was freaked the hell out, but turns out its not a big deal. I just stopped downloading copyrighted stuff and haven't heard from them since.  Truth is you got caught, no matter if you owned the game or not. If you want them to stop bothering you, either install better blocking software (I can't reliably tell you how safe this is) or stop downloading the stuff.  It sucks cause you own the game, but if it comes to your ISP shutting you down or a lawsuit, smart move is to just not do it again.
Sorry, went to take a shower. You thought I was kidding around up there? Heh. I thought you were playing along so I could have some fun.   I saw a chance to talk to a guy who had seen my poop. It's my thing. That was some one hand typing at it finest, while my mind was, uhhh, elsewhere.
Damn I've read too many Halo books. I keep reading UNSC and keep thinking United Nations Space Command.
Conkey- best episode ever!
&gt;I'm sorry, but there have to be some regulations on abortions.  Read Roe v Wade, it established such regulations.  I think you've been misinformed by (possibly undercover) propaganda from the so-called "Pro-Life" movement.  Roe established a three tiered law for abortions.  During the first trimester abortion is basically unrestricted, during the second trimester abortion is available but under stricter regulation, and in the third trimester abortion is prohibited except in cases where the life or health of the mother is endangered or where the fetus would be unable to survive after birth.  The situation that you imagine exists, the situation that the so-called "Pro-Life" movement likes to pretend exists, in which abortion is a total free for all and women can, at 9 months simply say "hey, I don't really want a baby after all, let's go get a late term abortion honey!" does not exist and never has.  Nor does any pro-choice person push for such a legal environment.  We're pretty much happy with the situation established by Roe.  You are, in other words, railing against something that does not exist.  Reality, as it happens, matches what you desire: abortion is available but increasingly restricted as the pregnancy progresses.  Rejoice for your desires are law!
51% of pro-choice Americans reach the opposite conclusion: what Tiller did was murder, and his neutralizer was a freedom fighter, not a terrorist.
By tactical shooter I mean an FPS requiring heavy strategy and coordination between teammates to accomplish an objective.
orc and elves? unfortunately, its short, but a decent game
Just be friendly with the guy. 2 years of kidney problems is enough to warrant a represcription.
Which is why I don't support that, I should've said "The *current* regulations on the private healthcare industry are counterproductive" because deregulation won't work, but the current regulations don't either.
I want you to build me an Olympic sized swimming pool using only a lamp shade.   If you can do that, I will believe only poor craftsmen blame their tools.
The best part is this quote.. "*Please don't re-distribute this on other sites, just share the link to this page around, kay?*"
Oh yes, that's a good point...amazing ending.
Tommy Douglas?
&gt;If you favor criminalization of abortion, all you favor is horrible deaths among lower-class women. You aren't putting a stop to it, and you're only deluding yourself if you think you are.  &gt;Otherwise, have the goddamn balls to stand up and proudly say, "YES! I believe these murderers do deserve to die horribly for their sins!" because that is the logical end result of your actions. And if you aren't willing to take responsibility for that, you are simply a coward.  I love false dichotomies.   If you've only looked at data from the US, or from so called "Western" countries, then don't make sweeping generalizations.  
Sue them. [Link](http://www.gamedaily.com/articles/features/ea-settles-overtime-suit-pays-149-million/68862/?biz=1](http://www.gamedaily.com/articles/features/ea-settles-overtime-suit-pays-149-million/68862/?biz=1)  Seriously, at every company I've worked at (game or not) I've been asked to give time estimates for my work. If you plan correctly from the beginning there's no reason to be doing 23 hour days all the time. During crunch for big things like e3 and shipping is a bit different; but every product-based programming gig I've seen has crunch periods. 
I've lately been [working on language interop in parrot](http://blogs.gurulabs.com/stephen/2009/05/cross-language-library-loading.html).  Just this weekend I added support for inter-language library loading to native parrot libraries and to my scheme compiler, allowing either of those to be used in Rakudo (Perl 6) or my ruby compiler (not a good compiler yet).  I still plan to add support to pynie (python) and pipp (php), once I figure out how things should work in those languages.  There are some parts of the API that I'm having trouble working out, so if anyone here is interested in this subject, I would love input from anyone.  Emai (me at allalone.org), IRC (tene on freenode), IM (email me for contact info), or whatever else.  I could use feedback on both the backend API that compilers need to implement and on the user-facing language-loading API for any of the Parrot languages.  The only language that actually has (kind of) a spec for this is Perl 6.  There's also been a few threads recently on [the perl6-language mailing list](http://www.nntp.perl.org/group/perl.perl6.language/) about the future of CPAN.  One of the major topics is support for other languages.  There's room for a lot of additional input there for anyone interested in the subject.
Thank you.
Gloom: I lol'd.
With our advances in science and civilization, hopefully we can soon remove the 1.5% of abortions that are late-term.  
Perfect.
Are you really that ignorant?  Bush went to war because we needed a foothold in Iraq, and 9/11 gave us the reason to make a play for it. It was a strategic move to secure oil resources necessary for our survival.  In case you haven't noticed, we have precious little domestically manufactured oil in this country - even less so since idiot Democrats won't let us drill off shore.  And in case you haven't noticed, we need oil to survive, and our military needs oil as well.  Now unless you're ok with playing second fiddle to Russia and trust Putin as the defacto world leader instead of the US president, I suggest you put your naive bullshit aside and start recognizing that the world is a very dangerous place and it's no fucking game to on the outside looking in.   Daddy issues, how stupid are you?
They took that "let's drive through the caravan" idea from *Mad Max.*
I live near the stadium of a major university and on one game night about 1 AM a drunken creep wandered into my backyard and started singing loudly  I demanded that he leave immediately but he was there for a long time, stumbling around. It scared me. I called the police and they said, "Sorry, we're too busy. Are the doors locked? Do you have dogs? ... we'll call in a few hours to check up on you."  They did. But the next morning I noticed that he had pulled up all four of my gate fence posts on the side of the fence that faces the street.
He's been arrested. 
i couldnt come up with anything.  i wanted something to make fun of the idea i hadnt participated before (ive beek lurking for over a year and a half now) and i didnt want to use my real name sooooooooooooooo i just used the first thing that came to mind with my year of birth.
While sending spies to bomb a Greenpeace ship that dared protest against the nuclear tests.
Leave?
Yea, I couldn't stand leo after titanic. 
i can think of at least 2 commandments being broken...
I doubt many people are scared of him *now that he is in prison*.  Moron.
Well, most of us don't, but I am glad all six pages were written, in case anyone ever has to debunk Oprah in court. 
Who gives a real crap what the W3C thinks is and isn't a standard.  The day that it is widely adopted will be the day it is the standard.  The W3C is just a bunch of people trying to have power when 99% of the time they are only making decisions on things that have already been decided.
GOODEVENING HBO  FROM CAPTAIN MIDNIGHT  $12.95/MONTH  ?  NO WAY !  [SHOWTIME/MOVIE CHANNEL BEWARE!]
J'en ai marre. Ca me fait chier. J'en ai ras-le-bol. Ca me casse les couilles.   :D
Happy Go Lucky.
Our Constitution is still standing? I thought GWB tore it in half and wiped his ass with it and Obama took the other half so when he finishes his big shit in 4 years he will have a clean bung-hole while they put ribbons on the turds.
"…all the best music's affiliated with Satan."  -*Bart Simpson*
I used to scrape the old site looking for brand names and car models of mates cars.  Now I don't have to.
Where did he go?
http://dictionary.reference.com/browse/terrorism  This is an odd case where the murderer probably is trying to disuade others from performing abortions but they are only a terrorist if they are successful in scaring you into altering your behaviour.
The most disgusting and wrong dead baby joke I've ever heard:  What's the difference between a dead baby and a cheeseburger?  I don't fuck my cheeseburger before I eat it.
What? It is terrorism by most normal standards. Yes its targetted rather than general but it is a very specific form of on going terrorism that has been used to shut down and scare off anyone who wants to facilitate abortion. Rather than convince people through argument these people choose to simply inact violence against enough of the medical profession to have them sufficiently terrorizied.  Things become very difficult when you limit terrorism to 'the general public'. An IRA bombing on a protestant church is not terrorism? A Sunni bombing on a Shia mosque is not terrorism? I admit its not something thats easily defined. I would say it was: A policy or ideology of violence intended to intimidate or cause terror, to influence a subsection of people, inacted by an ununiformed force on civilians. And I would say this fits the bill.
[Citation needed]
Colin Moock's books are the single best place to start. They build on simple beginnings, and go deeply into the details of the language and how things work. Then again, I came to ActionScript after working with a number of other languages, so I can't gauge how a newer coder would find them....
AIPAC is a propaganda organization which tries to influence public opinion and Government decisions outside of the Normal channels of International communications. They think they are 'Special'!
I'd just show up at my fiancée's home naked and drunk on a regular basis.   They'd cancel the wedding (you hope), and it doesn't involve losing your Johnson.
Regardless of what he did, Lebron needs to learn losing comes with the territory. Part of that is congratulating the other team, shaking hands and talking to the media.  Every great star in any of the 4 major sports knows this and does it. If he wants to be included with the likes of them, he better catch on to better sportsmanship. 
That's a big may.  That's assuming someone saw the shooter, determined his intentions before he shot, and soon enough to draw, take aim and fire. And of course that the killer would be down from those first bullet(s).   Good luck. 
NYC, since I've spent most of my time here, though I've been elsewhere,(spent summers in Florida with family and went to seaworld, UNiversal, etc).  NYC is my most favorite, since you can do just about anything in the metro area.  Florida is my second fav, South Florida is a great place, when its not raining.  The rest(east coast states) I've only driven, rode a train through. I plan on taking a train from NYC to San Francisco once I have enough money and seeing things along the way.
I thought that was just an over the top South Park joke?! I'm having a hard time to decide if this is more of a WTF than the actual billboard discussed...
Would you suggest C or C++, and why?
The only way to break in is with exposure. You must be seen. I would suggest getting into a semi-pro team, and prove you are good enough. There are many opportunities if you are willing to relocate for a little while. But, you have to learn to market yourself. A team has to believe you will be able to help them. It is a symbiotic relationship.  No, I never was on the same team as Reggie Willits.
&gt;Inevitably my comment is getting downvoted, because the children on Reddit are outraged that anyone dare suggest Islamist terrorism is actually real  No, I think it's because you don't know what "terrorism" means.  &gt;terrorism, as in the deliberate targeting of civilians, is widespread.  No, terrorism is the use of violence to create fear (or *terror*) for the purpose of an ideology. It is not simply targeting civilians, but targeting *anything* so long as it will spread terror in the population of interest.  While your examples of terrorism are, to my knowledge, apt, so is the example of a man opening fire in an abortion clinic for no other reason than because it is an abortion clinic (not a personal reason, i.e. if the doctor had slept with the guy's wife). It is both based on an ideology, and has the intended effect of spreading fear among those who work in abortion clinics.  EDIT: Whoops.
I believe every man should give his wife a pearl necklace before their wedding.
hola jajaja
I think I'll have to pass on that book, thanks.
I agree with automatedresponse that it's very important to be visible.  I use lights and a reflective vest to make sure everyone sees me.  I look like a dork, but I'm visible.  I've ridden in Hillcrest but it's been years.  I seem to remember that there are some major down/uphills around there.  I'd stay in Hillcrest neighborhood or Balboa Park until you've gained confidence.  
There's probably some made-for-girls porn that starts with this shit.  It would probably make your average male vomit though
Counter-Strike with a serious players.
Maybe you should put some quartz on your soul to release all that bad energy.
You got to love reddit always willing to help =D
its hard to feel sorry for someone who has killed so many babies. Hopefully hes in hell by now.
Actually, he's in JAIL. You only go to prison after you have been sentenced, moron.
Can I ask rye your father has so much bread in there?
You'd think a guy who was into killing babies, and who had been shot previously, would be packing heat. 
Apples and oranges.  You're comparing a situation in which there is a clear distinction between each person's body and one in which it is not.
I really don't want to get in the habit of banning posts or users.  But I don't want to get in the habit of overlooking this kind of stuff either.  Please don't pick on the noobs.   [what not to do](http://lostwebsite.wordpress.com/2009/05/10/arrogant_linux_elitists/)  [what not to do2](http://www.reddit.com/r/linux4noobs/comments/8jyjf/good_safeguards_read_for_more_what_not_to_do/)
ZombieBite is so much cooler!
*look down at chests, at each other, at wall behind them*   *raise guns in unison*  BANG BANG.
Except it's backwards.
You could be accused of having terrible taste in soft drinks.
[There was this SEO guy who flipped a shit because he got banned from reddit, and demanded hoodies in compensation](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/8o225/admitted_seo_guy_gets_banned_from_reddit_throws_a/)
A better description would be "person responsible for a man made disaster."  
I want to sodomize this administration
Honolulu Pride Festival 2009 featuring Tiffany.
You should visit your local sewage treatment plant. Everybody there has seen your poop as well. Smelt it as well. Masturbated? Who knows.
Any organization affiliated with the murderer should be treated as a terrorist organization, as this action is meant to terrorise doctors and other law abiding persons. That it is not a Muslim organization should not matter. The organizers should share the guilt, and punishment, of the murder.
He's got my support in the primary.  And more so because of the other planks in his platform. 
Whether terrorism is successful has no relevance to whether it is terrorism. One of the intents behind bombing abortion clinics and murdering those that staff them is to scare others into not working in that field. In fairness, we do not know specifically what Dr. Tiller's murderer's motives were, but it isn't unreasonable to conflate them with the well-known motives of many other abortion-worker-murderers.  Now, if this sort of behaviour doesn't make a doctor think twice about providing reproductive rights, then good for him or her, but that's certainly what these fundamentalists want.
He had to know he was always living on borrowed time.
Yep, we need rapists, murderers and assholes to make life more fun. You're right.
No, they don't even try to touch it because opera on Windows doesn't have significant market share.
What about non-Christian pro-life folks?  **Disclaimer**: For the record, my question is not related to the murder. Nevertheless, I'll be downvoted on the assumption that I'm pro life and endorse/defend this event. While I ask the question honestly, I also want to point out obvious biases in people who vote on the site, and their unwillingness to have dialog. 
PB&amp;J on rye? Ew!  Hopefully his fridge is full of sauerkraut, corned beef, and swiss cheese.
"If you're pre-born, you're fine, if you're pre-schooled, you're fucked. Conservatives want live babies so they can raise them to be dead soldiers. Pro-life, these people aren't pro-life, they're killing doctors, what kind of pro-life is that? What, they'll do everything they can do save a fetus, but if it grows up to be a doctor they just might have to kill it?" - George Carlin
after a time, was allowed to grow fainter; the dim groups gathered more andhim, his pipe, his pot of beer, his flowers, and his beehive, suggested an The pale face thus peeled in the lamplight revealed not so much rage asthings, the pattern of snail-shells, the glitter of insects' wings, colours, weakened. He was barely able to scrawl his name upon the receipt proffered "But the war's put an end to all that. They tell me that French people  quietly-- wide, terrified eyes.  "What!" cried the Secretary bitterly. "Do you believe all that tale shade. The monkey is only the policeman that may be. Perhaps a maiden lady  "No," said Syme, "they are formed along the parade."   Wanna slim down for summer? Go to America Takes it Off to learn how.  I'd buy it. 
Don't call them "Pro-Life". They aren't. They are anti-abortion.
Would you care to elaborate, or were you being sarcastic?
He left, but I don't think I would do something like get up and move just because I thought a guy was looking at me (which he might not have been doing). I don't like 'rejecting' people unless they're blatantly disrespectful because even as a girl, I think it's rude and arrogant of someone to be a bitch to a guy just because he was looking.   I just have a lot of anxiety regarding the opposite sex at this point in my life because of some past issues.
Probably. I think it is safe to talk to a cop if you get pulled over for speeding. In fact, it is probably a good idea.
getting better at self expression, which has a terrific feeling of satisfaction.
Really? When did this last happen?
But god [likes masturbation!](http://www.sexinchrist.com/masturbation.html)  &gt;The Scripture tells us that our bodies are the temples of the Holy Spirit, and that everything that we do should glorify the Lord. While masturbation is not a sin, we must be careful to masturbate in a way that is respectful to our bodies, and respectful to God. Masturbation is a gift that we should not abuse. This means we should not masturbate to excess, or to the point where we ignite ourselves. If you are masturbating until you are exhausted, or until your genitals are raw or bleeding, this is excessive, harmful, and not what God intended. If you masturbate compulsively to the point that it interferes with your work or your relationships with friends, family, and God, this is a problem. If you masturbate while indulging in impure thoughts (fantasizing about your neighbor’s wife, for example), this is also a misuse of God’s gift.
no, hes a hero, think of all the babies hes saved.
To quote [my reply to karmanaut](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/8oq5z/this_is_probably_a_stupid_idea_but_here_goes_ill/c09yilf?context=1):  &gt;Yep, I created [/r/disapproval](/r/disapproval), and I'm a mod of [/r/bash](/r/bash).  [/r/bash](/r/bash) is fairly large (&gt;1500 subscribers), though hardly on the level of something like AskReddit.
It's the phonetic spelling of the first syllable of my last name  Ciuffo = "chew-foe"  The "ci" makes the "ch" sound in Italian such as in words like \*raises hands in air\* *"fettucini"*
I still don't understand your name.
It's probably someone who got laid off from the zoo who was used to feeding hippos.
ahhh BT, a company who ignores there own ex directory customers wishes to be ex directory.
Touche
He said the reason was because he didnt trust us to aim. He didnt want any urine spots on the bottom rim. He would catch some of the us and say, "Who spotted the toilet with urine?!?!." The 2 weeks I worked there he abused me pretty bad so the last day I peed everywhere in that bathroom and left forever. Felt good.
"If you're pre-born, you're fine, if you're pre-schooled, you're fucked. Conservatives want live babies so they can raise them to be dead soldiers. Pro-life, these people aren't pro-life, they're killing doctors, what kind of pro-life is that? What, they'll do everything they can do save a fetus, but if it grows up to be a doctor they just might have to kill it?" - George Carlin
He _is_ doing a new show, as the article says. Comparing it to Zero Punctuation is retarded. That's like comparing Halo to WoW, to put it in (more) game speak.
I'm still holding out for a roflbrothel.
Pulse is my biggest complaint. I am likely to reboot once a week or maybe less but pulse is likely to cause my at least an hour of grief a week. I still can't use Skype properly on Jaunty because of a bug in Pulse.  Also boot times = until login screen? or until usable desktop? I think it takes my laptop about 20-30 seconds to get to login screen. It's the loading of Gnome desktop that takes another minute.
[Know Nothing movement](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Know_Nothing)
Pro-unborn-fetuses-ers ?
Consider opening your freezer:  Empty: Cold air goes out, "warm" air goes in.  Air must be re-cooled.  Full: Less cold air goes out, less warm air goes in.  Less energy wasted.
A blueray player could cost $10 and be available across the street from me. I would still not be interested.   * 90% of people's TVs are not high enough quality to show you the difference between BR and DVD. * BR stifles creative innovation by making publishing out of reach to small studios. * BR has heavy DRM that makes it impossible to back up your media. * BR stores more information on a smaller space, this makes it way more likely that a tiny scratch will make you media garbage. * Only a small selection of movies are available on BR versus DVD.  * A BR writable drive is cost prohibitive to consumers(if you can even get one) * Writeable BR discs are in the same boat as the drives. * BR movies cost way more than a DVD with very little reasoning other than Sony royalties. In comparison, an external HD is less than half the price GB for GB.  I can go on, but I'd rather let some other people make points here. People who purchased BR disc also purchased these items:  * Monster Cables * Denon Ethernet cables
I have had some pretty lucid hallucinations (to the point of questioning reality) and have had dreams I confused with real life. Makes me question whether I can really prove anything.  &gt;If it takes a shit on me, I'll totally accept it's real.  The Reality-Shits test. I like it.  &gt;That was fun! Let's talk about sex and politics next.  Let's. Hopefully in the same subject. I look for you when I'm trollin'. At least I made one friend in this discussion. Judging by my comments' karma I certainly made a few enemies. 
errors   * [line 1] "solid" is not a valid value for CSS property "border-top"  html {   * [line 1] "transparent" is not a valid value for CSS property "border-top"  html {   * [line 1] "1px" is not a valid value for CSS property "border-top"  html {   * [line 1053] "center" is not a valid value for CSS property "float"   float:center;   * [line 1112] "-moz-outline-style" is not a valid CSS property  .instructions a:focus { -moz-outline-style:none; }   * [line 1171] invalid CSS property list "border-top: solid transparent 1px"   border-top:solid transparent 1px;   * [line 1189] "-moz-outline" is not a valid CSS property   -moz-outline:none;   * [line 1383] "auto" is not a valid value for CSS property "padding"   padding:auto;  images
Right On!   Language is meant to convey more than "just the facts", but also emotion and context.  That's especially important on the internet where gestures and intonation aren't available for that purpose.  To complain about it is just fucking maiden-aunt-prudish.   It's a common ploy to complain about the presentation when one has no way to attack the content.
{{hugs}}
My father hitch-hiked from Massachusetts to Arizona on a few hundred dollars back in the late '70s. He parties a lot in Ohio with some friends, and ended up virtually broke. Luckily, he ran across a 40-50 year old man who went by the name Dutch Holland. It was obviously an alias, as he had Hell's Angels tattoos and scars on his face. Luckily, the guy didn't kill him, and only subtly hinted at some of the crimes he had committed. He drove them through 4 or 5 states without asking for a cent.
Semantics.  You fucking prick.
Why the fuck didn't you tell us someone was in the bathroom? Slip your mind? Why didn't you tell us someone was in there with a goddamn *hand-cannon*?
Also known as Crazium.
"N.Korea do pose a threat"  Really? Who to?
um...it used to be 1-2 cans a day.  Then it became my vice and I am up to maybe 6. I'm a college student and with those late nights of studying I need caffeine, but I've never liked coffee.  I'm thinking about quitting for health reasons and the fact that I will save a lot of money.
Nothing but since he kills children as if it's nothing why not kill some of his family members also, just like it's nothing.
Yo.
Turn it into a zombie raptor-jesus and I'll be behind it 100%
Not a the moment, I did go solo with GNU/Linux for a while but i needed the windows for my studies so I had to reinstall it. Now I spend about 80% of my time in windows. Its just too comfortable to be honest, Linux can be a real pain sometimes. 
I disagree, considering that the killer is probably a Christian and that this, to them is a holy and sacred place.
How do you cite something like ease of use? Just take a look at any recent ThermalTake case. Everything is screwless, there are no rough edges, the thing is like roomy like a castle but light like a fiberglass speedboat. It's a dream to use.
&gt;unhealthy, not to mention dangerous.
It's hell on platemail if you miss the save.
I'd cut those figures down.  $4 to the head shop, $10 to consumer. It's a novelty item--not very functional for long.
You see the size of that gun he fired at us? It's bigger than him!   We should be fuckin' *dead*, man.
Woah amazing.  Thanks for going above and beyond an explanation.  This is the kind of reply I search reddit for all day.
Oops. I accidentally my comment. Damn iPhone.
What if someone else shaves him?
When I left to drive cross country, my dad gave me $40 in loose change in a bucket "for the tolls". Also, a survival kit, which included several of those shiny sub-zero blankets. To drive through the southern U.S. In August.
My frosh year of HS I was 4ft 11, and weighed 79lbs.  I was scrimmaging with the varsity soccer team, and played rough, despite the opponents being twice+ my size.  Got the nickname Danimal, and my high aggression and fervor during that season, as well as the following wrestling season, made it stick.  Been 9 years now, and everyone I know calls me Danimal.
Can I get a layman explanation of this?
How about you fuck yourself?  I couldn't care less if he "doesn't view abortion as murder".  The purpose of the procedure is to transform a live human being into a dead one.  If he "doesn't view abortion as murder" he is an idiot.
&gt; ...even read all of it? I know it was a lot, but...  gosh... that sure was a lot!  Although thank you, I did get your point by reading the first line of every paragraph you've written.
I know. that's why I said I was joking.  I'll bold it so they know for sure.
North Korea still hasn't tested anything 10% as powerful as the Hiroshima bomb.
I forgot the date of birth I entered and have no way to access my old neopets account. :(
Wikipedia has citations. =D
Ok, thanks for confirming the trolling.
Douchebag anti-Semite.
Yep, ever since people discovered he's not Ron Paul.
I sink we can just move on..
All they needed to do was remove the tv, computer, and phone from his home.  Then take out the ramps or place a 2x4 at the base of each door.  Way cheaper.
Terrorism plain and simple.
&gt;they're not helping it in anyway. if anything they're hurting out personal lives more.  If your an American, go to a sink, and turn on the faucet. If something other than diseased ridden puddle water comes out, your government might be helping you in some small fashion on a daily basis.  Do not take for granted the infrastructure that we have in this country, and how good it is, and how it benefits us everyday. If you don't think they are doing anything for you, move to Somalia. I hear it's nice there this time of year, and the government leaves you alone, completely.  This submission really doesn't have any nefarious information in it. Just seems like useless information for demographic research. I'm not proud my tax dollars are supporting it, but I really don't think its a useless thing. Mountains out of mole hills.
Arch Linux!!! WOOOO YEAH!!
&gt;if you're not responsible enough to use a fucking rubber or birth control then you need to take responsibility  No form of birth control is 100% effective, and there are valid medical reasons to abort for the health of the mother. Don't pretend every abortion is about shirking responsibilities.
Sadly it's a fact that even Titanic survivors die.
the Gooch
Some are those are awesome, they get silly towards the end.
The way I look at it is this: I may feel that late term abortions are wrong, but I'm not the one having a child. I will also never be the one one with a fetus, baby, whatever growing inside of me.  I don't think I have any authority to tell a woman what to do with their body, and as far as I am concerned, if the thing is still dependent on the mother's body, it is still part of it.  I think it would be sick to kill, or not allow life to a person that is basically fully developed but it is not my decision, if someone feels that they can live with that it is their choice to make.
Actually, that would make for a good essay.  It's, uh, self-driven learning!
It would be nice if it didn't include shit like lulz
What makes a heartbeat and brainwaves so special?  Mice that we kill without hesitation have those.  Hell, mosquitoes do too. Until the end of the second trimester, when the neocortex becomes functional, that fetus in unarguably neurologically inferior to any mammal, including the aforementioned mouse.  Why should it be deserving of greater rights?
It's all bad news for any woman who thinks she has an equal place among the wealthy males of the world, as was seen at the recent secret billionaire's meeting.
You sir have a talant
"If you're pre-born, you're fine, if you're pre-schooled, you're fucked. Conservatives want live babies so they can raise them to be dead soldiers. Pro-life, these people aren't pro-life, they're killing doctors, what kind of pro-life is that? What, they'll do everything they can do save a fetus, but if it grows up to be a doctor they just might have to kill it?" - George Carlin
Coaching advice from Jack Perconte, former major leaguer, hitting coach and author
I think we have all lost it - and by *all*, I mean **all**
lol.  Looks kinda like Salad Fingers
It is so dangerous to give people with no medical background such a platform.  The average person watching these television programs is unable (or unwilling) to perform critical thinking/research on their own. Given the massive influence that Oprah has on America, this is pretty fucking terrifying.  People take her word (and the words of "experts" on her show) as the absolute truth.
I never believed in god.  There are 500 corpses in the freezer and I have no teef.
If you are unemployed now, then I would recommend volunteering for your choice charity. Let them know your interest in a job. The volunteering will be like on the job training, and you would be first in line for a job if you get to learn the ropes well enough
&gt; **Physics** is like sex. Sure, it may give some practical results, but that's not why we do it.  Fixed that for you.  Also: applied math.
"Right, but N. Korea is a real threat - for the past 2 years they have been testing missiles (which can be outfitted for nukes because they PLAN to do something"  They PLAN do they? And your source is?
&gt;Peggy: "Remember the time we had breakfast for dinner?" &gt; &gt;Hank: "Yes. *Never again.*"
That's kind of off-topic, no?
linux on my tv-room laptops (for anyone to use) which hang out in different spots near the couches ... vista on my desktop.  Love both.  
This probably isn't the first time you've heard this, but that's too little, too late.
awww, thank you &lt;3
asshole yourself you naive twit, third trimester abortions as often as not are junkie débutantes whose parents won't suffer the humiliation.  
It gave these errors before I even tried to edit the CSS. Also tried to post in a functioning subreddit's CSS, and same errors.
Seems a bit like a sales pitch. Fungus shares none of the unique properties of the internet.
&gt;You also stated that if he did end up being motivated by pro-choice ideals, you would be the first to jump up and say terrorist.  and if his motivation for the violence was a political goal.  &gt;I'm not the government, I do not use this word lightly, please stop comparing me to them.  That why I said "I take issue with the lax manner in which the term "terrorism" is used by the government **and private individuals** in the US."  &gt;A larger conspiracy isn't needed in this case, because it IS NOT AN ISOLATED CASE. This is not the first doctor killed in the idea of "the sanctity of life", only the most recent.  You're right, a larger conspiracy is not necessary, but for this to be "lone wolf" terrorism rather than someone who is a member of an organization with a policy of terrorism, then there needs to be evidence of the motive for this specific act on the part of the individual.  The fact that violence against civil rights leaders was widespread does not make the woman who first tried to assassinate MLK Jr. a terrorist, nor does it make her part of an organization or larger movement, does it?
How so? The system itself would never have to rest, eat, find a date, etc. If anything Google has shown us distributed computing works exceptionally well. Perhaps it would have problems communicating with us but this would be solved in time with faster internet connections.
Esty is my middle name, but it encouraged the nickname Esty D (or S T D) when I was in high school.  Nobody calls me that anymore, so I use it as a general alias on the internet now.
**Your Evil 1 eye 1 brain teachers** won't let you know *simultaneous harmonic 4 Day Time Cube wisdom.* Educated stupid ONEness *equates death of opposites!* **YOU** were born Unified Value of Opposites, mom &amp; dad together Cubic opposites value. King of Genius **Dr. Gene Ray** discovers *Math &amp; Science Proof* of **TimeCubed Earth!** Only SuperNatural Cubic Wisdom can rotate a *96-hour 4 day cube* in just one *simultaneous rotation*. **4-corner full-day Cubic creation disproves pseudoscience Singularity religion:** **YOU WORSHIP A HALF-BRAIN SATANIC IMPOSTOR.** **ONE-GOD TRAINED STUPID RELIGION IGNORES CUBIC WISDOM AND THE WISEST MAN AT ITS OWN PERIL!**  *YOU are a Cubic creature!* Dog brain **trained stupid educators** will deny you *Simultaneous 4 Day Time Cube.* **Think with your Harmonic Opposite Brain to destroy educated dumb one-day evil bastard ONEism!**
The bible.
Fucktard.  Fucktard.
What are you going to complain about once flash is dead?  I promise you that the same people who write poor code and do annoying things will still be doing it once they can use open standards to get their message across.  The only reason they use a proprietary tool like flash now is that they simply can't do many of the things they want to do with the current standards.
These two groups should be the first port of call for anyone who thinks that the only music out these days is T-Pain and Chris Brown.
This is anti-productive in many ways and in the common fallacy that she is doing something good by asserting her self and volunteering.   I was in boy scouts, I have mentored math for years and have participated in  big brother like programs for over two years.   one who looks at what I have done can generally agree that I was helping but it is the fallacy that simply asserting my self is good.  What if I was teaching kids "bad math" or even being a horrible "big brother".  What ever she is doing will boost her time with adults and interactions with intellectuals and that's great. However what the fuck is she doing?  should one not expect someone trained to do something not to do it?  Should we not expect her to grow up and fight the war on terror?  Should we not expect her to side with the one she is already devoting so much time for. It's unfortunate that is comes to this and it's something we all should think of. There is a time for every thing and I think it's our responsibility to be prepared. Now she and others are prepared.  Prepared by the government. The fucking government.... Kids with limited critical thinking are being prepared for situations and will respond with the justifications of the government behind them. 
I don't see how this compares... have the Jews been forcing bigotry on the public in the US?  The mormons have. That is why it is not disgusting, but accurate, to warn against mormon influence.  Bigotry MUST BE STOPPED.
&gt;That's mighty odd given: ... &gt;&gt; methods.include? "proc"  That's only testing against public methods and proc is a private method on Object. Try: `private_methods.include? :proc`
Doubtful, this is the same company that tried to get its customers to buy both UMD movies and DVDs.
upvoted for *are*
the blame is the recession. Government budgets are always sensitive to recessions there is no way around it. You can hedge some risk here and there but ultimately it needs a stable growing economy in order to remain out of the red.  The real question is what do you do when a recession hits? You obviously have decreased tax revenue and you obviously need to cut spending. So what do you cut?  You are conveniently ignoring a very simple fact that the budget increases for the last decade are not due to welfare, social services, medicare or anything of that nature its the earmarks and what lobbyists have pushed for.
It is definitely worth watching, it will be the happiest 122 minutes of your life.
Well that's what Dr. Bill O'Reilly said!
Nope!
&gt;Roger Furhman: “Maintain eye contact with a cougar.  Don’t turn your back on it.  Pick up any kids that are in the area, bring your animals, your dog, if you have a dog, get your dog back to you and get it out of the area and then just slowly back away.”   yellowking: Grab your AR and kill the fucking thing so you don't have to worry you won't see it first next time.
I really think it's funny how arrogant you are, with your dismissive attitude, calling me childish.   When you are the one who has no problem with link-jackers??  Sorry man, but in this case, you are just plain wrong and your own ego is preventing you from seeing that I'm right.   You can't argue with reddiquette, I didn't write it, it is what it is, and if you don't like it, then fuck off and take your blogs and your spammer buddies with you.  This is a no spam zone and that includes link-jacking, and if you don't like it, tough shit, we don't want that garbage here on reddit.   You may be older than me, obviously, if you have 30 years of programming experience.  Must have been interesting working with the punched cards on fortran, heh..  but your age and your experience have obviously led you down the wrong path and I think you really need to reassess why you are acting in support of blog aggregators (link-jacking).  People don't want to see that shit, people want to be linked directly to the original source article.  It's quite plain and simple.  Those people are parasites and fill up the web with advertising nobody wants to see.  They are trying to make a few pennies on their banner ads and their adsense and their SEO tricks, I say fuck all of them!  If this includes you, and it seems like it does, then ditto to you too!   &gt;Good luck with your petty vendetta.   Hey, I didn't start /r/reportthespammers and I didn't start the war against the link-jackers, this was already going on before I came on reddit over 2 years ago.  The people over at RTS are doing what they feel is right, you call it vigilantism, I call it community service.  You call it blog aggregation, I call it link jacking.  You want to try to gain support for link-jackers and you want to think that's OK, but it's not, and you are dead wrong.  They are just as bad as spammers.  Is that really the side you want to be on?   I have no problem with people who want to self-promote their own self-generated content.  If someone wants to write a blog, write their own article and have their ads on the sides of the page, that's fine, I don't care.  But when someone blatantly rips off articles from other sites and makes it so you have to click another link to get to the real, original article, that's bullshit.  And anybody who think's it's OK is fucked in the head.  
you're breaking my heart.
Who or what gives anyone the right to Accuse - Judge - Execute outside of the Law?
One and the same.
Actually, we do have ninja monks. But we don't have them for fighting, we have them just because, you know, ninjas are *cool*
I'm in the same boat. I test IE in XP I run as a VM using KVM. I also used Google Sketchup most recently as I couldn't get it to run under Wine.
When are they going to get that blond girl to fist her on a public street?
If we can’t collect payment from your debit card on the day you selected you'll have broken your promise and will incur a £10 administration fee towards the cost of a failed collection. Interest will also continue to accrue.  If we are declined by your bank a second time and haven't heard from you, you'll have failed to honour your loan agreement. We will hand your account to a debt collection partner and may add additional default charges, totalling up to £105, towards the costs of our collections efforts. Sustained failure to repay a loan will also lead to a black mark on your credit record and potential legal action, both of which could make it very difficult to gain credit in the future.
I hate to invoke Godwin, but just as an exercise - how would we feel (if we cold somehow remember the difference) if a pro-lifer were to go back and kill Hitler?  To these people, it's not so much a matter of irony as necessary evil.
Found an amazing married woman that does not get any sex from her husband so she wants to screw as many times as we can get together in a week. Knockout body, excellent sex, and loaded with cash. I really hope she never meets my wife. All through an internet ad.
Wheat a minute... are you trying to start a bun thread?  
My mom said that the first rule her dad taught her when she learned how to drive was "always assume everyone else on the road is an idiot."  That's the first rule my mom taught me, and it's worked out pretty well so far.
The difference is that when DVD came out, people's TV were high enough quality to notice a difference. This is definitely not the case with BR. BR is almost stepping into the $600 audio cable market, "As an audiophile, i can hear the difference".
"Redefining our appreciation of music" is quite a lofty goal. I'd say perhaps 5 maybe 6 bands have done that in the past **century** but perhaps our standards are a bit different.  I don't need my music to be revolutionary. I want my music above all to show thought and intent, which unfortunately only a select group do... If that's the bar that we set then there are some bands these days who fit the bill.  I'm partial to a lot of bands based on mood etc. etc. How 'bout we go for bands that fit that mold that I've listened to within the past month?  Zero 7 - Great. Ambient Rock.  Beck - If there's anyone who's got his own genre of rock...  Daft Punk - I don't love 'em, but when they're on their marks they're great.  of Montreal - 'Educated' euphoria pop rock. That's a mouthful. They're a personal favorite.  Elbow - They did a great live orchestral set that really ties together their material well.  TV On the Radio - New album is quite good.  Andrew Bird - He's been mentioned. For a reason.  Brett Dennen - There aren't many **great** singers in rock these days. He's probably one of them. My list of others probably includes Amy Millan, Gavin DeGraw (just lost my credibility with that one, but the man can sing just about anything you throw his way)... couple of others that I don't remember off the top of my head  Hot Chip - They're sound is very unique. Take a look at 'Hold On' from their newest album. It's the most accessible song (and probably their best as well.)  Cold War Kids - Their new album is pretty bad. The first album is pure gold.  Needless to say there are many others... lots of bands are trying to do unique things.. the question is who's making it work.
Arch Linux!!! WOOOO YEAH!!
the text is not aligned with the billboard
If George Bush got gunned down like this guy did, I'd understand a lot of people (Americans included) not mourning. That doesn't mean they don't condemn his murder.  Those comments reveal a bias - just as comments in this thread do. The comments (mostly) here both condemn his death and assert explicitly or implicitly that he did something right in his life by carrying out abortions.   The site's comments condemn his death but emphasize that they think he was in the wrong.   I don't see what the issue is. It seems like you want them to condemn it *and* take a pro-abortion view.  
&gt;Submitter is long time Ron Paul 'tard.  Wow, really?  Danny, is that you?
Um... the incline?
he hoo ha, and i thought *my* jokes were bad.
